<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88616-0028 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-16-88.f2.A1027</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4>/ Vol. 53, No. 116, Thursday, June 16, 1988 /Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Occupational Safety and Health Administration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="50">29 CFR Part 1926</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. S-301A]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Concrete and Masonry Construction Safety Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This rule revises OSHA's safety standards for Concreteand Masonry Construction (formerly <T3>Concrete, Concrete Forms, and Shoring</T3>) located in Subpart Q of29 CFR Part 1926. The rule corrects problems related to the existing regulations,including ambiguities, redundancies, and gaps in coverage. Additionally,reference to the American National Standard A10.9-1970, ``Safety Requirementsfor Concrete Construction and Masonry Work,'' has been removed and theapplicable requirements from this standard and the more recent ANSI Standardfor Concrete and Masonry Work, ANSI A10.9-1983, have been evaluated andused in developing this final rule. The revised rule is intended to reduceoccupational fatalities and injuries in concrete and masonry constructionwork.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>August 15, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mr. James Foster, Office of Informationand Consumer Affairs, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, RoomN3647, U.S. Department of Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington,DC 20210, Telephone (202) 523-8148.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>Congress amended the Contract Work Hours Standards Act (40 U.S.C. 327 <T3>et seq</T3>.) in 1969 by adding a new section 107 (40 U.S.C. 333) toprovide employees in the construction industry with a safer work environmentand to reduce the frequency and severity of construction accidents andinjuries. The amendment, commonly known as the Construction Safety Act(Pub. L. 91-54; August 9, 1969), significantly strengthened employee protectionby providing for occupational safety and health standards for employeesof the building trades and construction industry in Federal and federally-financedor federally-assisted construction projects. Accordingly, the Secretaryof Labor issued Safety and Health Regulations for Construction in 29 CFRPart 1518 (36 FR 7340, April 17, 1971) pursuant to section 107 of the ContractWork Hours and Safety Standards Act.The Occupational Safety and Health Act (OSH Act) (84 Stat. 1590; 29 U.S.C.651 <T3>et seq</T3>.), which was enacted by Congress in 1970, authorized theSecretary of Labor to adopt established Federal standards issued underother statutes, including the Construction Safety Act, as occupationalsafety and health standards. Accordingly, the Secretary of Labor adoptedthe Construction Standards, which were issued under the Construction SafetyAct in 29 CFR Part 1518, in accordance with section 6(a) of the OSH Act(36 FR 10466, May 29, 1971). The Safety and Health Regulations for Construction, Part 1518, were redesignatedas Part 1926 at the end of 1971 (36 FR 25232, December 30, 1971). The standardentitled Concrete, Concrete Forms, and Shoring, andSection; 1926.700 through1926.702, was adopted as an OSHA standard as part of this process. Exceptfor some minor amendments, Subpart Q has not been substantially changedsince it was adopted in 1971. In spite of the promulgation in 1971 of theseregulations to address hazards in concrete and masonry construction, accidentscontinue to occur.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Hazards in Concrete and Masonry Construction</ITAG>OSHA examined a number of accidents that occurred in concrete and masonrywork since OSHA's inception in 1971, including the accidents at WillowIsland, West Virginia, where a cooling tower collapsed and 51 workers werekilled, and the collapse of the Skyline Tower Plaza in Fairfax County,Virginia, which took 14 lives. Also included in OSHA's examination weremany masonry wall collapses. Although many workers have been injured orkilled in wall collapses, these accidents had not received the publicityor public attention that the structure collapses had received, probablybecause workers are killed one at a time rather than in large numbers atone time. OSHA identified hazards that contributed to these accidents whichcaused worker injury and death. OSHA then reviewed its existing regulationsto determine if the hazards identified such as formwork failure and thecollapse of masonry walls were adequately regulated.The review revealed ambiguities, redundancies, gaps in coverage, and, insome cases, requirements which did not allow use of state-of-the-art technologicalchanges. For example, the existing standard was ambiguous as to which provisionsof ANSI A10.9-1970 were referenced by existing andSection;1926.700(a). Inparticular, the OSHA requirement in andSection;1926.700(a) states that employersshall comply with the ``applicable provisions'' of ANSI relating to equipmentand materials, which could cause confusion as to which of the ANSI requirementsare indeed the ``applicable'' ones.Another example of ambiguity is the requirement that concrete buckets beequipped with hydraulic or pneumatic operated gates. The existing requirementstates that the installation of positive safety latches or equivalent devicesis to prevent aggregate and loose material from accumulating on the topand sides. This statement is misleading, as the real purpose of safetylatches is to prevent the accidental or premature dumping of the contentsof the bucket, not to prevent material accumulation.Additionally, the existing standard recognizes only one method of testingconcrete and yet there are several test methods approved by the AmericanSociety for Testing and Materials (ASTM) for testing concrete to determinethe extent to which concrete has reached its designed strength. Based on this review, OSHA determined that a revision of the existing standardwas warranted to address more appropriately the hazards in concrete andmasonry work. As a first step, OSHA published an Advance Notice of ProposedRulemaking (ANPR) to gather information for developing a proposed standard.The ANPR, which was published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(47 FR 5910, February 9, 1982), requested publiccomment on the effectiveness of the existing standard in reducing accidentsin the concrete and masonry construction industries. OSHA received 46 commentsin response to the ANPR (Ex. 1), some of which confirmed OSHA's beliefthat the existing standard was inadequate for current construction methods.OSHA then sought the advice and recommendations of OSHA's Advisory Committeeon Construction Safety and Health (ACCSH) at its meeting November 30 andDecember 1, 1982.Using the information gathered in response to the ANPR and the recommendationsreceived from the ACCSH, OSHA developed and published a Notice of ProposedRulemaking (50 FR 37543; September 16, 1985) to seek public comment. WhileOSHA was conducting its rulemaking activities, accidents in concrete andmasonry construction continued to occur.OSHA received 51 comments on the NPRM from individuals, businesses, laborunions, Federal agencies state governments, and trade associations.Additionally, OSHA held an informal public hearing on June 17-18, 1986,to examine pertinent issues including those specified in a Notice of InformalPublic Hearing published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on April 8, 1986 (51 FR 11945). Two expert witnessestestifed at the hearing on behalf of OSHA, and seven additional witnesseswho represented various interests such as labor, engineering firms, andformwork designers also presented testimony.Following the hearing, Administrative law Judge Ellin O'Shea allowed 120days for the submission of post-hearing comments and 30 days for the submissionof arguments and briefs. Judge O'Shea certified the 332-page hearing transcriptand all related submissions to OSHA and officially closed the record onDecember 8, 1986.All of the comments and testimony were reviewed and analyzed for use indeveloping this final rule. Then, while OSHA was preparing the final rule,another tragic accident occurred. This time, a building in Bridgeport,Connecticut, collapsed, taking the lives of 28 workers. Like the otheraccidents, OSHA's investigation of this collapse revealed that there hadbeen a failure to comply with the existing regulations, regulations thatsome thought were ambiguous and others thought needed more flexibilityto provide an incentive for compliance_regulations that OSHA has revisedin this Final Rule, except that the regulations for lift-slab operations,as discussed below, are not a part of this Final Rule. The existing requirementsfor lift-slab operations remain in effect.The Final Rule removes ambiguities that have existed; closes gaps in coverage;recognizes techological changes; and finally, where possible, uses languagethat states the performance to be achieved by the employer without specifyingunnecessary details as to how the employer must meet the requirement. OSHAbelieves that compliance with the revised regulations in Subpart Q willreduce the deaths and injuries that have plagued the workers in concreteand masonry construction. The revised regulations set forth requirementsto protect construction workers from such hazards as those described aboveinvolving premature removal of formwork, failure to brace masonry walls,and other harzardous situations such as failure to support precast panels,inadvertent operation of equipment, and unguarded reinforcing steel.Some of the revisions made in the final rule include the elimination ofthe reference to the ANSI A10.9-1970 standard. OSHA, instead, has promulgatedmany provisions that are identical or similar to provisions in either theANSI A10.-1970 or the ANSI A10.9-1983 Standard for Concrete and MasonryWork.OSHA has also revised its requirements for concrete testing, allowing employersto use methods other than the one specified in the existing rule. OSHAbelieves that all of the testing methods listed in Appendix A will providethe employer with the information necessary to determine if the concretehas reached its design strength, and therefore will reduce the hazardsof premature formwork removal.OSHA observes that it is not revising the existing requirements for lift-slaboperations as a part of the Final Rule. Instead, OSHA is reopening therecord to receive additional information and evidence. Additional informationand evidence became available to OSHA as a result of its investigationof the collapse of a building under construction using the lift-slab constructionmethod, and was not available to the public rulemaking record at the timeOSHA was considering its revision to the Concrete and Masonry ConstructionSafety Standards. OSHA intends to repropose the section on life-slab operationsas a separate rulemaking effort. OSHA has met with the ACCSH to obtaintheir recommendations and advice on the reproposed rule and will publisha Notice of Proposed Rulemaking later this year. When the lift-slab operationrequirements are promulgated, they will be located in Subpart Q.OSHA appreciates the participation of the parties who contributed to therecord during this rulemaking. OSHA has developed this final rule basedon a full consideration of the entire record of this proceeding, includingthe recommendations of the ACCSH, the record of the hearing and all writtencomments and exhibits received.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Summary and Explanation of the Final Rule</ITAG>The following discussion summarizes each of the provisions in the finalrule and explains how they differ from the proposal and the existing rule.The discussion also includes an explanation of how the Agency arrived atits final decision.OSHA requested comments on several specific issues in the preamble of theproposd rule (50 FR 37549) and in the hearing notice (51 FR 11945). Allof these issues, and the comments received on them, are discussed in conjunctionwith the appropriate provisions of this final rule.Subpart Q Concrete and Masonry ConstructionThe title of Subpart Q is revised to read ``Concrete and Masonry Construction,''which properly reflects the construction operations regulated by the subpart.This title is identical to the title that was proposed. OSHA proposed tochange the existing title, ``Concrete, Concrete Forms, and Shoring'' becauseit implied that the scope of Subpart Q covered only the hazards associatedwith concrete and the forms and shoring for concrete. The subpart alsocovers, however, the hazards of masonry construction. The revised title,therefore, reflects the entire scope of the standard.OSHA received only one comment on the title. That comment was presentedby a witness at the public hearing (Tr. I, 84). The witness, John Hanson,said that OSHA should consider changing the title to ``Special Requirementsfor Concrete and Masonry Construction'' so it would be emphasized thatthere were other requirements which are common to all construction operationsthat also would apply to employers performing concrete and masonry operations.The witness felt that there could be confusion_that employers engaged inconcrete and masonry construction would think that only the requirementsof Subpart Q applied to their work operations. OSHA agrees that this subpartdoes not contain <T3>all</T3> of the safety standards requirements that apply to employersengaged in concrete and masonry construction operations, and OSHA doesnot want employers to be confused about their obligations under the constructionsafety and health regulations. However, OSHA feels it is more appropriateto clarify the scope of the subpart in the scope and application paragraphrather than attempt a clarification through a change to the title of thesubpart.In addition, it should be pointed out that there are other subparts inthe construction standards that address hazards which are unique to a particulartrade or operation and those subparts do not use the title of the subpartto convey that information. Thus, to include ``Special Requirements'' inthe title of Subpart Q could create confusion about the scope and applicationof other subparts not containing this type of qualification in the title.Therefore, OSHA is promulgating the title as proposed.Section 1926.700 Scope, application and definitions.This section of the final rule describes the scope and application of SubpartQ and defines the major terms used in the final rule.Paragraph (a) contains the scope and application of Subpart Q. The scopeand application paragraph in the final rule states that the standard setsforth requirements to protect all construction employees from the hazardsassociated with concrete and masonry operations performed in workplacescovered under 29 CFR Part 1926. Part 1926 covers workplaces where construction,demolition, alteration and/or repair, including painting and decoratingactivities are performed. Additionally, OSHA has further indicated in thescope and application paragraph that other requirements throughout Part1926 may have application to concrete and masonry construction operations.OSHA also observes that while this section addresses hazards unique toconcrete and masonry construction, this section is not exclusive to employersin those operations. That is, employees of all trades must be protectedfrom the hazards addressed in this subpart, just as concrete and masonryemployees must be protected form the hazards addressed in other subpartsof the 1926 regulations. For example, Subpart Q addresses the hazards associatedwith protruding rebar and collapsing masonry walls. While employees engagedin concrete and masonry operations would most likely be the employees primarilyexposed to these hazards, other construction employees (engaged in otherthan concrete and masonry operations) could also be exposed to these hazards;thus, all exposed employees need protection from these hazards.The proposed standard contained a scope and application paragraph whichindicated that the standard addressed materials, equipment, and proceduresfor concrete and masonry construction operations. The proposal furtheridentified the scope of the standard by listing some of the hazards associatedwith such materials, equipment and procedures. In proposing this particularlanguage, OSHA was attempting to establish a uniform format with the scopeand application section of all of the construction standards, beginningwith Subpart Q. The existing standard does not have a scope and applicationparagraph. In fact, many of the existing subparts in the construction standardslack a scope and application paragraph. It was OSHA's intent in the proposalto highlight the hazards addressed in each subpart of the constructionstandards by providing a list of hazards addressed in the standard. Thislist was, therefore, made a part of the proposed scope and applicationparagraph.Upon further consideration, however, OSHA does not feel the intended purposehas been served by merely listing some of the hazards addressed in thestandard. The highlighting of only some of the hazards may cause some confusionif employers depend on the scope and application paragraph alone to discoverwhat hazards are addressed by the entire subpart. Therefore, in the finalrule, OSHA has retained a revised scope and application paragraph for uniformity,but deleted the list of hazards.In addition to this change, OSHA has added a new sentence to the languageof the scope and application paragraph. This language was prompted by twocomments. The first comment, discussed previously, was submitted by JohnHanson (Ex. 18). The second comment was submitted by Technical Safety Associates(TSA) (Ex. 14-34). Both commenters recommended that OSHA add a sentenceto the scope and application paragraph to make it clear that, in additionto the requirements of Subpart Q, many other requirements throughout Part1926 apply to concrete and masonry construction operations.OSHA agrees with the commenters that it is appropriate to make it clearlyunderstood that other requirements in the construction standards (Part1926) have application to concrete and masonry construction operations.Also, there are requirements in Part 1910, Safety and Health Standardsfor General Industry, that have been identified as having application tothe Construction Industry that may also apply to concrete and masonry constructionoperations. (See 44 FR 8755; February 9, 1979 and corrected at 44 FR 20940;April 6, 1979). In light of these considerations, OSHA promulgates paragraph(a) as revised.Paragraph (b) lists and defines eight terms of special application as usedin the final rule. There terms are provided to assist employers and employeesin understanding the requirements in the final rule. Each definition isdiscussed separately below.Paragraph (b)(1) contains the definition for ``bull float.'' OSHA had proposedto delete this definition since the requirement which dealt with bull floathandles was proposed for removal and, thus, there would be no need to definea term not used in the standard. There were no comments received on theproposed removal of the term from the definition paragraph. However, uponfurther consideration OSHA has decided to retain the requirements for bullfloat handles in the final rule, and, therefore, OSHA retains the termas defined in the existing standard. A complete discussion of why OSHAdecided to continue the requirement for bull floats can be found in thesummary and explanation for andSection; 1926.702(h).Paragraph (b)(2) contains the definition for ``formwork.'' Formwork isdefined as the total system of support for freshly placed or partiallycured concrete, including the mold or sheeting that contacts the concreteas well as all supporting members including shores, reshores, hardware,and bracing.The existing standard defines ``formwork'' or ``falsework'' to mean thetotal system of support for freshly placed concrete, including the moldor sheeting that is in contact with the concrete as well as all supportingmembers, hardware, and necessary bracing. OSHA, in proposed paragraph (b)(1),revised the existing definition by deleting the words ``falsework'' and``necessary.'' The term ``falsework'' was removed because the term is nolonger widely used in the field or even understood to be synonymous with``formwork.'' The word ``necessary'' was removed because it was too vague.Further, the word ``necessary'' as used in the existing standard indicatesthat bracing is not always used with formwork, but if it is, it would bepart of the ``total formwork system.'' There were no comments on the removalof these words.In addition, in Issue andplusmin;9 of the proposed rule (50 FR 37550), OSHArequested specific comment on whether or not the definition of ``formwork''should be revised to exclude shores and reshores. OSHA explained in theproposal that it considers shores and reshores to be supporting membersand thus considered them part of the ``total formwork system'' even thoughthe words shore and reshore were not specifically written into the existingdefinition. Based on a review of the comments on this issue, OSHA soughtto determine if it were widely understood that shores and reshores arepart of the total formwork system or whether shores and reshores shouldbe defined separately and addressed separately when promulgating regulationsfor formwork. Several commenters (Exs. 14-2, 14-8, 14-10, 14-27, and 14-48)stated that shores and reshores should be part of the definition becausethey are part of the total formwork system. Three commenters (Exs. 14-16,14-35 and 14-44) indicated that they felt shores and reshores should bedefined separately and not included within the definition of formwork.They based their comments on the distinction between the support functionof the entire formwork system versus the independent support function ofshores and reshores.In addition, the Building and Construction Trades Department, AFL-CIO (BCTD)(Ex. 14-40) commented ``* * * we see no need to redefine formwork to excludethe concept of shoring * * *.'' They further stated that OSHA should expandthe definition to indicate clearly that the formwork system not only supportsfreshly placed concrete, but also partially cured concrete.After careful consideration of the comments and testimony received on thisdefinition, OSHA has determined that ``shores'' and ``reshores'' are generallyconsidered as part of the total formwork system and has revised the finalrule specifically to state this determination. This is accomplished byinserting the words ``shore'' and ``reshoring'' after the phrase ``supportingmembers.'' In addition, OSHA agrees with the BCTD comment that formworkbe capable of supporting both freshly placed as well as partially curedconcrete. Therefore, OSHA has added language to the definition to makethis intent clear. Finally, OSHA has made some editorial changes (the words``is in'' have been added before ``contact'' and the word ``with'' hasbeen added after ``contact'') for clarity. OSHA believes the revised definitionmore clearly describes what formwork is and what role it plays in supportingthe concrete.Paragraph (b)(3) contains the definition for ``lift slab.'' Lift slab isdefined as a method of concrete construction in which floor and roof slabsare cast on or at ground level and, using jacks, lifted into position.OSHA, in proposed paragraph (b)(2), defined ``lift-slab'' to mean a methodof concrete construction in which floor and roof slabs are cast on or atground level and hoisted into position by jacking. There were no commentsreceived on the proposed definition. The definition for this term in thefinal rule is essentially the same as definition in the proposal, exceptthe words ``by jacking'' have been replaced with ``using jacks'' and ``hoisted''has been replaced with ``lifted.'' These revisions are simply editorialand made for the purpose of clarity. This term, however, is not definedin the existing OSHA standard because lift-slab operations are not specificallyaddressed. The existing standard, however, <T3>requires</T3> compliance with the American National Standards Institute(ANSI) A10.9-1970 (Ex. 9) which addresses lift-slab operations. OSHA proposedto create a specific section on lift-slab construction, using the currentANSI standard as a base document, thus creating a need to define the term``lift-slab.'' Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(3) as revised.Paragraph (b)(4) defines ``limited access zone'' as an area around oneside of a masonry wall under construction which is clearly demarcated tolimit access by employees. This term was not defined in the proposal noris it defined in the existing standard because there were no specific proposedor existing requirements for establishing limited access zones.After careful consideration of the comments and testimony received in responseto the requirements proposed for masonry construction in andSection; 1926.706(see discussion below), OSHA is requiring a new work practice in the finalrule which will require the employer to establish a limited access zone.Since this term is not used in the OSHA standards, OSHA has determinedthat it is necessary to define this term in the final rule. Therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(4).Paragraph (b)(5) contains the definition for ``precast concrete.'' ``Precastconcrete'' means concrete members (such as walls, panels, slabs, columns,and beams) which have been formed, cast, and cured prior to final placementin a structure.OSHA proposed to define precast concrete to mean a concrete member whichis formed, cast, and cured prior to placement in a structure. There wereno substantive comments received on the proposed definition. However, theNational Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) (Ex. 14-39)in commenting on the specific requirements section for precast concrete,questioned OSHA as to whether or not <T3>slabs</T3> were considered to be a precast member. OSHA observes thatif the slab were formed, cast and cured prior to being placed in the structure;i.e., not cast in place, it would be considered to be ``precast.'' However,to avoid any confusion, OSHA has identified several typical types of precastmembers in the definition. In addition, the word ``final'' has been addedto indicate clearly that the concrete member is placed at a location differentthan the location where it was formed, cast, and cured. Again, the term``precast'' is not defined in the existing standard because precast concreteoperations are not specifically addressed. However, the existing standard<T3>requires </T3>compliance with ANSI A10.9-1970 (Ex. 9) which addressesprecast concrete operations. OSHA proposed to create a specific sectionon precast concrete, using the current ANSI standard as a base document,thus creating a need to define the term ``precast concrete.'' Therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(5) as revised.Paragraph (b)(6) contains the definition for ``reshoring.'' ``Reshoring''means the construction operation in which shoring equipment (also calledreshores or reshoring equipment) is placed as the original forms and shoresare removed to support partially cured concrete and construction loads.OSHA, in proposed paragraph (b)(4), defined ``reshoring'' to mean the constructionoperation in which the original shoring is removed and replaced in sucha manner as to prevent collapse of the concrete structure. This term isnot defined in the existing standard. However, since reshoring operationsare specifically addressed in the regulatory text of the final rule, OSHAhas determined that it should be defined.OSHA received only one comment on the proposed definition. That commentwas received from the Washington Metropolitan Area Construction SafetyAssociation (WMACSA) (Ex. 14-29). They recommended that ``reshoring'' bedefined to mean the placement of shores after forms are stripped to supportmembers and construction loads safely. In addition, the WMACSA and theBCTD (Ex. 14-40) both commented on the reshoring requirement containedin andSection; 1926.703(b)(10) indicating concern with how OSHA describedthe time/sequence for erecting reshoring.After careful consideration of the comments received, OSHA has determinedthat the proposed definition should be rewritten to more accurately describewhen reshoring operations take place_as the original forms and shores areremoved. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(6) as revised.  Paragraph (b)(7) contains the definition for ``shore.'' ``Shore'' meansa supporting member that resists a compressive force imposed by a load.There were no comments received on the definition proposed in paragraph(b)(5), which is identical to the definition contained in the existingstandard. OSHA notes that when performing reshoring operations, shoresare often referred to as ``reshores.'' Thus, this definition is applicableto both shores and reshores. OSHA, therefore, promulgates paragraph (b)(7)as proposed.  Paragraph (b)(8) contains the definition for ``vertical slip forms.'' ``Verticalslip forms'' means forms which are jacked vertically during the placementof concrete. In proposed paragraph (b)(6) OSHA did not change the existingdefinition, which is essentially the same as the final definition exceptthe words ``and continuously'' have been deleted. There were no commentsreceived on the definition. However, OSHA did receive one comment on thespecific vertical slip form requirement which caused OSHA to revise thedefinition. That commenter, the National Chimney Construction Safety andHealth Advisory Committee (NCCSHAC) (Ex. 14-16), took exception to OSHA'suse of words which implied that vertical slip forms move continuously.Rather, they described the process as distinct, discrete steps that occuras the jack moves vertically. OSHA acknowledges that ``continuously'' isnot quite accurate and has decided to delete the word because it appearsunnecessary to convey the rate of movement in the definition. Therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(8) as revised.  Finally, the existing standard contains the term ``guy'' to prescribe amethod of supporting reinforcing steel in walls, piers, and columns. OSHAproposed to delete the definition for ``guy'' since the proposal used thewords ``laterally supported'' instead of ``guy.'' OSHA had proposed thischange to enable employers to use other methods of supporting the reinforcingsteel. There were two comments received on the proposal to delete the definitionfor ``guy.'' The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented that the term ``laterally supported''should be defined in the final rule because it is a substitute for theterm ``guy.''  In addition the WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) commented that the definition for theterm ``guy'' should be retained. They further commented, ``When bracingreinforcing steel, a tension load is normally applied. A cable, chain,or rod may be used. Lateral implies sideways or horizontal bracing.'' However, the final rule for supporting reinforcing steel does not containeither term. Therefore, neither of these terms are defined. A more completediscussion of the reason for deleting these words can be found in the discussionof andSection; 1926.703, cast-in-place concrete.Section 1926.701 General requirements.  This section of the final rule contains general work practice requirementsrelated to construction loads, reinforcing steel, concrete buckets, workingunder loads, and personal protective equipment. The proposed rule alsocontained a section on general requirements, but it contained only oneprovision. To promote a more logically organized standard, the final rulerelocates all ``general'' type work practice requirements applicable toboth concrete and masonry work to the general requirements section.  Paragraph (a) of the final rule prohibits the placement of constructionloads on a concrete structure or portion of a concrete structure untilthe employer makes a determination on the basis of information receivedfrom a person qualified in structural design that the structure or portionof the structure is capable of supporting the loads.  The intent of this final rule requirement is to prevent accidents suchas the one that occurred on April 27, 1978, in which 51 employees werekilled. In that accident, concrete was being placed in the forms for acooling tower under construction at Willow Island, West Virginia. The formworkcollapsed when the third bucket of concrete was being hoisted up to theworking platform. All the employees on the formwork fell to the groundbelow. The National Bureau of Standards, in a report for OSHA, concludedthat the most probable cause of the collapse was due to the impositionof construction loads on the tower before the structure had gained thestrength to support the loads. Observance of either andSection;andSection;1926.701(a)(1) or 1926.701(a)(4) of the existing rules could have preventedthis accident. Likewise, observance of the final rule requirements of thisparagraph and andSection; 1926.703(a)(1), which address the hazard describedabove, will prevent these types of accidents.  The final rule is essentially the same as the proposed andSection; 1926.701,except the phrase ``engineer/architect'' was replaced with ``until theemployer makes a determination on the basis of information received froma person qualified in structural design.'' The proposed rule was basedon existing andSection; 1926.701(a)(4), which prohibits the placement ofany construction load on the partially completed structure unless suchloading has been considered in the design and approved by the engineer-architect.OSHA proposed to revise the existing rule by deleting that portion of theprovision which required that construction loads be ``considered in thedesign,'' leaving only the requirement that the engineer/architect approvethe placement of loads on partially completed structures. OSHA proposedthis revision because engineers/architects are not always aware of allconstruction loads that will ultimately be placed on the structure, andthus, they would not be able to properly consider all such constructionloads in the design stage. However, OSHA believes that the employer, asthe person who has the ability to take corrective action and as the personwith ultimate responsibility for the safety and health of the workers,also has the responsibility for making such decisions. OSHA also believesthat the employer must make the determination about whether or not to placeconstruction loads on the basis of information made available by a personqualified in structural design. Thus, OSHA proposed continuing this partof the provision.  Several comments were received on the proposed provision. Dun-Par EngineeredForm Company (Dun-Par) (Ex. 14-10) commented that the proposed provisionwould prevent any activity on partially completed structures because theengineer or architect will not approve the placement of construction loadsbecause they believe that they may be held liable if a failure occurs.The Milwaukee Construction Industry Safety Council (MCISC) (Ex. 14-19)recommended that the provision be revised to read: `` * * * constructionloads exceeding 75 percent of the design load shall not be placed on thepartially completed structure unless such loading has been approved byan engineer or architect * * *.'' However, the commenter did not specifywhy the 75 percent number was selected, or if the limit only applied toconcrete structures which had reached the design strength. The WMACSA (Ex.14-29) commented that the words ``engineers'' and ``architects'' are ambiguousand they should be licensed or registered professionals rather than ``qualifiedpersons.'' The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented that the engineers and architectsshould not only consider construction loads in the design, but should alsoapprove their placement on the structure. However, they provided no additionalinformation for the basis of their comment.Because the comments were not accompanied by supporting data, OSHA soughtadditional comment in the hearing notice on the placement of constructionloads on partially completed concrete structures. OSHA explained that sometimesconstruction loads are supported by partially completed concrete structureswhich may not be designed to carry such loads, even if the structure hadreached full design strength. Through review of the comments, OSHA soughtto determine whether engineers or architects incorporate all the constructionloads which may be placed on the structure into the design of the structure,and if they in practice approve or disapprove the placement of such loadsduring construction. OSHA also sought to determine who should be responsiblefor determining whether the structure will support itself and any superimposedloads prior to placement of such loads.There were three comments received on this issue. Two of the commenters(Exs. 14-47 and 18) argued that engineers or architects do not considerconstruction loads in the design of the structure. Ceco Industries, Inc.(Ceco) (Ex. 14-47) stated that construction procedures and the nature andmagnitude of loads applied to structures are normally left to the contractor.Ceco further stated that the method of concrete construction is the responsibilityof the employer. Testimony at the hearing by John Hanson, an OSHA expertwitness (Tr. I, 86), addressed this issue.Mr. Hanson testified that engineers and architects do not consider allconstruction loads on partially completed concrete structures in the designphase because they cannot envision every possible method of constructionor source of construction load. Ingvar Schousboe, the other OSHA expertwitness (Ex. 19), commented that construction loads may or may not be consideredspecifically in the design phase. Mr. Schousboe stated that contractors[employers] should know what construction loads were assumed in the designand should not attempt to place larger loads without competent engineeringapproval or advice. Mr. Schousboe also stated that this approval or advicewas once referred to the project engineer on the design team, but currentpractice makes it necessary for the contractor to have an in-house engineeror obtain a consultant service.After carefully considering all the comments and testimony received, OSHAhas decided to delete the requirement for the specified engineer-architectservices. This decision is based on the comments and testimony receivedwhich indicates that engineer-architects frequently do not consider constructionloads in the design, nor do they approve their placement on partially completedstructures. However, OSHA believes that it is still important that someonebe responsible for performing this service. Therefore, OSHA is requiringthat the employer make the determination that the structure or portionof the structure is capable of supporting the construction loads. The employermust make this determination on the basis of information received froma person qualified in structural design. This revision also places responsibilityfor employee safety with the person directly responsible for the concreteoperations. In addition, the language in the final rule will allow theemployer to consult with engineers or architects or whomever the employerchooses to make the determination, providing the person is, in fact, qualifiedin structural design. In some cases, the employer or an employee may possessthe qualifications necessary to make such determinations on the basis ofhis or her own qualifications in structural design and may not need toconsult with others. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (a) as revised.Paragraph (b) of the final rule requires the employer to guard all protrudingreinforcing steel to eliminate the hazard of impalement whenever thereis a danger that employees will fall onto or into the reinforcing steel.The intent of this provision is to prevent accidents such as the one thatoccurred on June 11, 1976, in which one employee was killed. The employeewas operating a powered concrete buggy to transport concrete when he lostcontrol of the buggy. The employee then fell, landing on protruding reinforcingsteel which pierced his shoulder and ear. (Ex. 5). Observance of the requirementin the existing rule in andSection; 1926.700(b)(2) to guard the rebar couldhave protected the employee from the hazard described. Likewise, observanceof this final rule provision will protect employees from the hazard ofprotruding reinforcing steel. The final rule differs from the proposed provision which was located inandSection; 1926.702(a) and the existing provision in andSection; 1926.700(b)(2).Under the proposed rule, employers could either protect the reinforcingsteel or, in the alternative, protect the employee from falling onto thesteel by requiring the employee to use fall protection devices. The existingrule required only that the employer guard vertically protruding reinforcingsteel when employees are working above it. Several comments were received on the proposed revision. The National ErectorsAssociation (NEA) (Ex. 14-22) commented that they agreed with the proposedrevision allowing the option of using a fall protection system in lieuof covering, shielding, or bending over the protruding reinforcing steel.The NEA further stated that the proposed rule would eliminate complianceproblems at multi-employer work sites where one employer may be requiredto provide protection for employees of other employers. Three other commenters (Exs. 14-40, 19, and 24) argued that OSHA shoulddrop the fall protection alternative because it would provide less protectionthan the existing rule. In particular, the BCTD (Ex. 14-40), said that`` * * * permitting fall protection as a substitute for protecting protrudingreinforcing steel provides significantly less protection than the currentstandard does * * *. Moreover, permitting the use of fall protection asa substitute divides responsibility among the various subcontractors onthe site whose employees may, at different times, be exposed to the protrudingsteel rods.'' BCTD concluded that, `` * * * fall protection is an unsatisfactorysubstitute for actually guarding the steel.'' They recommended that fallprotection be dropped as an alternative. In addition, the United Brotherhood of Carpenters and Joiners of America(Carpenters) (Tr. I, 38) testified as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">A recent BLS study (Ex. 24A) of falls from elevations showed thatin construction, 89 percent of the workers surveyed were not using fallprotection at the time of the accident. Of those workers, 32 percent saidthey were not high enough to need any, 43 percent said it was not practicalto use in that type of work. Of those using fall protection, 26 percentfell from the side or area not protected by the guardrail. For nine percentof those using fall protection, the guardrail broke. Three percent of thoseworkers fell over the guardrail, and another three percent fell under theguardrail. In 28 percent of these cases, the fall protection was not connectedbecause the worker was moving around.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The Carpenters, in their post-hearing comment (Ex. 30), further statedthat both fall protection and rod covering should be required. The National Constructors Association (NCA) (Ex. 14-36) stated that thewords ``to work'' should be stricken so that employees are prohibited aboveprotruding reinforcing rods, unless protection is provided. NCA furtherstates that there should be no difference between ``working'' and ``walking''surfaces. OSHA notes that it considers employees who are walking in thearea of vertically protruding reinforcing steel to be ``working'' and thuscovered by the proposed rule. However, to avoid any misunderstanding, therevised rule excludes the words ``to work'' and applies the provision toworkers who may become impaled as a result of falling onto or into protrudingreinforcing steel. Finally, Technical Safety Associates (TSA) (Ex. 14-34) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">This portion of the standard is not clear to many people. This againappears to refer only to working up in the air above rebar and that protrudingrebars from the ground need not be covered or protected. Many accidentsoccur when employees are walking along ground level, trip, and are impaledon protruding rebar.</ITAG>The comments received prompted OSHA to seek additional information in thehearing notice on the proposed rule to protect employees working abovevertical protruding reinforcing steel. OSHA explained in the notice thatthe proposal required employers to protect the reinforcing steel or preventthe employee from falling. Through review of the comments, OSHA soughtto determine whether fall protection provided less protection against thehazards of impalement than guarding the reinforcing steel. In response to that notice, John Hanson (Tr. I, 88) testified at the hearingthat fall protection is needed to prevent impalement when employees areworking above adjacent working surfaces, irrespective of whether the reinforcingsteel has been protected.   After careful consideration of the comments received, OSHA agrees thatthe use of fall protection systems should not be allowed as an alternativeto the requirement to guard protruding reinforcing steel, because employeesafety will not be adequately provided. The record (as evidenced by theBLS statistics on falls which were presented in testimony and discussedabove) demonstrates that even when employees are provided fall protection,fall protection systems, for various reasons, do not always prevent orstop employees from falling. In come cases, employees fall over or underguardrails that should have provided the needed fall protection. In someother cases, employees were required to be in motion and had disengagedfrom the provided fall protection systems. In other words, fall protectionsystems are not 100 percent effective in preventing employees from fallingand unless the employees are prevented from falling, the hazard of impalementon rebars is not controlled or eliminated. On the other hand, if rebaris guarded at all times (covered or bent over), the hazard of impalementis always controlled or eliminated. In fact, OSHA does not know of a singlecase where an employee was impaled after having fallen into rebar thathad been guarded. Therefore, the proposed option of providing fall protectionin lieu of guarding rebar is deleted in the final rule in order to affordthe greater employee protection. In addition, OSHA believes that comment of TSA has merit and that all employeesshould be protected from being impaled. OSHA's intent is to eliminate thehazard of impalement completely. OSHA did not intend that the use of theword ``above'' would be construed to mean that the entire body of an employeewould have to be ``above'' the protruding steel. OSHA realizes that employeescould be, in fact, often are, in a position where only part of their bodyis above the protruding steel, such as walking alongside of protrudingrebar where as TSA points out, the employee could trip and then fall intothe steel. Likewise, there are situations where the steel is protrudingfrom a horizontal direction and employees could fall or trip into the steeland become impaled. To properly protect employees from the hazard of impalement,OSHA has revised the provision to state clearly that all protruding reinforcingsteel is to be guarded whenever employees could fall into or onto the steeland thereby become impaled. In light of the above considerations, therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraph (b) as revised. Paragraph (c) contains provisions related to post-tensioning operations.Paragraph (c)(1) requires the employer to prohibit employees (except thoseessential to the post-tensioning operations) from being in the area behindthe jack during tensioning operations.Paragraph (c)(2) requires the employer to erect signs and barriers to limitemployee access to the post-tensioning area during tensioning operations.Although there were no specific provisions proposed to address post-tensioningoperations, OSHA observes that the existing standard (the referenced ANSIA10.9-1970 standard) prescribes requirements to protect employees fromhazards associated with post-tensioning operations. Because OSHA felt thatthe hazards associated with post-tensioning were adequately addressed byother sections in the 1926 standards, it decided that instead of proposingadditional requirements, it would raise an issue regarding this subject.In particular, in Issue andplusmin;8 of the NPRM, OSHA asked questions regardingpre-stressing and post-tensioning operations. Specifically, OSHA askedwhat are the hazards associated with such operations and what standardsare needed to protect employees performing such operations? In response to the issue, OSHA received a wide variety of comments, manyof which focused on hazards addressed elsewhere in Part 1926_the ConstructionSafety and Health Standards. For example, fall hazards which are regulatedby Subparts E and M were cited; fire hazards which are regulated by SubpartsC and F were cited; and the need to establish good work practices (training)which are regulated by Subpart C were cited. Some of the specific commentsincluded the following. Gilbane (Ex. 14-28) commented on the similarities of erecting pre-stressedconcrete and compared it to steel erection, noting the fall hazards associatedwith the erection process. On post-tensioning, Gilbane noted that in additionto the hazard of falling, the employee could be struck by items fallingfrom above. Gilbane also commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">Also of concern is the practice of cutting the post-tension in strands.They are torched cut. This could cause a fire hazard to those below. Asthey are not supposed to be torched cut, but cut with a hydraulic cutter,this should not be a problem. The elements that are being cut cannot beallowed to fall unrestrained to the lower levels. Only trained personnelshould perform these hazardous operations.</ITAG>CAL/OSHA (Ex. 14-2) in commenting on the need for good workmanship in tensioningwires noted that a qualified person should have a good quality controlinspection before the concrete is poured into the slab. Likewise, the AGCA(Ex. 14-31) commented, ``Any hazards resulting from tensioned wire ropeelements (pre or post) have as their root cause poor installation. As isthe case with most components associated with concrete placement, properinspection and good workmanship during installation will avoid mishapsrelated to tensioned wire rope.''Several commenters noted that employees should not work directly in linewith the wire rope being tensioned, that employees should work from theside and that warning signs or audible warning should be used. For example,Bechtel (Ex. 14-35) commented, ``No significant hazard exists. Good practiceis to avoid working directly behind or in front of wires being tensionedto eliminate the potential for injury if a break of slip occurs. No regulationis required.'' The Philadelphia Electric Co. (Ex. 14-27) commented thatpersonnel should not be permitted in the vicinity of the tendons duringthe tensioning process.NIOSH (Ex. 14-39) commented, ``The greatest risk of serious injury is associatedwith the sudden release of energy from the tensioned element. These elements,rods or wire rope, are oftentimes subject to loads of 200,000 psi. Shoulda rope or rod fail and strike an employee, serious injury is likely tooccur.''The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented, ``The process of tensioning the wire ropeelements is among the most dangerous of the concrete construction operation.It exposes the workforce to a number of hazards, the most serious of whichis getting hit by snapped cables.'' The BCTD further commented that theybelieved it was necessary to set standards to protect workers from thesehazards. They recommended barriers and signs during post-tensioning asrequired in the ANSI A10.9-1970 which was formerly incorporated by OSHA.OSHA expert witness, Ingvar Schousboe (Ex. 19), testified that most pre-tensioningtakes place in prefabrication plants. He recommended that warning signalssuch as flashing red lights and horns or klaxons signify that stressingis to commence so all nonessential persons could leave. He also said, ``Nobodyever stands in the line of a strand,'' adding that, ``I know of no casewhere a strand has been broken after the stressing was completed and thestrand properly anchored.'' On post-tensioning he said, ``Nobody shouldbe permitted to be in line with the strand being stressed.''The Carpenters (Ex. 24), when testifying on OSHA's cost figures for thesigns and barriers during pre- and post-tensioning operations, commentedthat these provisions are in the ANSI standards and accepted industry practicewhich indicated to them that they are a part of any good safety programand could not be considered burdensome. They also said that most of theindustry will continue to provide protection from these hazards, OSHA regulationor not.The NCA (Ex. 14-36) commented that this subject deserves separate and fullattention because of the numerous hazards associated with such operations.They suggested that OSHA reserve a section in Subpart Q and seek publiccomments through an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking. NCA did notelaborate on the ``numerous hazards.''The WMACSA (Ex. 14-19) commented that pre-stressed concrete is generallyfabricated off the job and post-tensioning is completed on the job. Theyalso commented that the 1983 version of ANSI should be included as partof the OSHA standard. Finally, the AGC of Dallas (Ex. 14-8) commented,``No standards are necessary.''Based on a careful review of the comments and testimony, OSHA has determinedthat while most of the hazards associated with both pre-tensioned and post-tensionedconcrete are adequately covered throughout Part 1926, there is a need forfurther regulation. In particular, the evidence and testimony demonstratethat during post-tensioning operations, it is critical that all non-essentialemployees be kept out of the tensioning area. Because construction sitesare typically occupied by several trades at the same time, it is virtuallyimpossible to tell each potentially affected employee exactly where thepost-tensioning operations will be conducted so that they will stay clearof the area. Additionally, OSHA does not believe that it is feasible forthe post-tensioning employer to station an employee at potential entrancesto the post-tensioning areas to keep non-essential employees out of thearea, yet OSHA is requiring that non-essential employees be prohibitedfrom the area. OSHA believes, as supported by the comments, that the existingrequirement located in section 9.5 of the ANSI A10.9-1970 standard to erectsigns and barriers is an effective way to communicate with all workersat the site that the area is ``off limits.'' The signs and barriers willlimit employee access and therefore employees will not be behind the jackduring tensioning operations.Therefore, to provide a proper level of employee safety, OSHA is continuingthe existing requirement that no employee (except those essential to thepost-tensioning operations) be permitted to be behind the jack during tensioningoperations and that signs and barriers be erected to limit employee accessto the post-tensioning area. Based on these considerations, paragraphs(c)(1) and (c)(2) are promulgated. Paragraph (d) of the final rule prohibits employees from riding concretebuckets. This paragraph was relocated from andSection; 1926.703(a) of theproposal and is based on existing andSection; 1926.700(d)(7)(ii), which prohibitsriding concrete buckets for any purpose. The final rule is essentiallythe same as the proposed rule, except it has been reworded to clarify thatthe employer cannot permit employees to ride the buckets. Two comments were received on the provision to prohibit the riding of concretebuckets. The NEA (Ex. 14-22) stated that employees should be able to rideproperly equipped buckets to avoid enormous scaffold and ladder problemswhich could expose employees to potentially more danger than riding thebucket. However, the NEA did not provide any data to support this position.The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented, ``Since the OSH Act places the responsibilityfor compliance with standards on employees, 29 U.S.C. 654, this paragraphshould be amended to require that employees shall not be permitted to rideconcrete buckets.''After careful consideration of the comments received, OSHA has decidedto revise the proposed rule using language to reflect the concerns of theBCTD. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (d) as revised. Paragraph (e) of the final rule contains two requirements concerning workingunder loads. The requirements pertain to working under concrete buckets.Paragraph (e)(1) requires the employer to prohibit employees from workingunder concrete buckets while the bucket is being elevated or lowered intoposition. Paragraph (e)(2) requires that when concrete buckets are beingrouted overhead, the employer must, to the extent practical, route elevatedconcrete buckets so that no employee, or the fewest number of employees,are exposed to the hazards associated with falling concrete buckets. The final rule is a revision of the proposed provision in andSection; 1926.703(b),which was based on the existing provision in andSection; 1926.700(d)(7)(ii).Like the existing provision, the proposed rule only afforded protectionto workers of vibrating crews. Clearly, overhead concrete buckets posethe greatest hazard to vibrating crews. However, other workers on the siteare faced with the same hazard, albeit less often, when concrete bucketspass over their heads. For example, on October 13, 1977, two carpenterswere killed when a bucket containing wet concrete dropped and crushed thetwo workers. On September 29, 1980, a pile driver was killed when he wasstruck by a bucket filled with concrete. Observance of this provision ofthe final rule will protect all employees from the hazard of falling concretebuckets, not just the vibrating crew which is afforded protection underthe existing requirements in andSection; 1926.700(d)(7)(ii). Because of the lack of protection to other workers, OSHA decided to requestspecifically, in Issue andplusmin;7 of the NPRM, information on the needto expand the proposed provision to prohibit all employees from being underconcrete buckets. OSHA explained that concrete buckets have fallen whiletransporting concrete from the concrete trucks or other source to its placementand crushed employees working below. Several comments were received onthe proposed provision and in response to the specific questions askedin Issue andplusmin;7. Several commenters (Exs. 14-29, 14-36, and 14-40)stated that employees should be kept out from under concrete buckets. TheBCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented, ``A falling concrete bucket is a recognizedhazard in the industry, against which all employees should be protected.''Another commenter (Ex. 14-19) stated that it is not always possible toprevent vibrator crews from working under concrete buckets. Three commenters(Exs. 14-20, 14-21, and 14-35) stated that a requirement to keep all employeesout from under concrete buckets would have an adverse impact on constructionprocedures. For example, Alabama Power (Ex. 14-20) commented, ``In somecases, all [concrete] placement and possibly finishing personnel wouldbe required to stop work and move.'' The commenter also stated that thiswould disrupt the placing and finishing operation of any concrete placementand would increase costs. Six commenters (Exs. 14-8, 14-16, 14-17, 14-28,14-31, and 14-45) stated that it was not always practical to keep all employeesout from under concrete buckets. For example, the NCCSHAC (Ex. 14-16) commentedas follows: <ITAG tagnum="21">Proper workplace assignments should strive to assure that loads arenot swung directly over working areas. The operator of the equipment mustbe continually aware of personnel working in the area and govern his operationsaccordingly. In some operations, however, such as the pouring of slabs,a concrete bucket is swung over the area where concrete is being placedand vibrated. While personnel should not be assigned to work directly undersuch areas, nevertheless, there may be times when it is unavoidable. </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Three commenters (Exs. 14-2, 14-33, and 14-36) recommended that allemployees should be kept from under concrete buckets. For example, theNCA (Ex. 14-36) commented, ``Reasonable efforts should be taken by employersto keep all employees from under suspended loads, including concrete buckets.''The comments received prompted OSHA to seek additional comment in the hearingnotice on whether or not it is practical to keep all employees from underconcrete buckets. Four comments were received in response to this issue. The four commenters(Exs. 14-47, 18, 19 and 21) stated that it would not be reasonable or practicableto keep everyone out from under concrete buckets. For example, Ceco (Ex.14-47) stated that it would be difficult to remove everyone from the pathof the load because this requirement would become very disruptive to theconstruction process. John Hanson (Ex. 19) stated his agreement with othercomments to the effect that it is not reasonable or practical to keep everyoneout from underneath concrete buckets. Hanson further stated that, ``Itwould be my view that danger to employees in working underneath overheadloads, and in particular in working underneath concrete buckets, occursas the load is first being lifted or as the load is brought to its finalposition.'' Hanson explained his view, saying that ``The hazard comes mainlyfrom sudden or unexpected movement of the load and also the risk of thatload hitting some other element on the construction site.'' Hanson alsorecommended that andSection; 1926.21(b) should contain a specific requirementfor employers to inform and instruct employees of the need to be consciousof overhead loads and to avoid unnecessary exposure to overhead loads.Further, Hanson suggested that the provision in question be revised torequire employees to be kept out from under a concrete bucket wheneverit is less than 20 feet in height or closer laterally than 10 feet to anyother element of the construction. Mr. Hanson acknowledged that the numbersrepresented his personal judgment, indicating that other persons may havedifferent numbers.Finally, Ingvar Schousboe (Ex. 19) stated, ``It is not always practicalto keep everyone out from under concrete buckets'' and suggested, ``Verycareful planning of the bucket's path may help: try to avoid coming inabove steel setters and finishers, ahead of and behind the delivery spot,respectively.''OSHA has determined, based on the record, that it is not possible to keepall employees out from under suspended concrete buckets at all times. However,OSHA believes that there are certain precautions that must be taken toeliminate or control the hazard when the greatest potential for exposureexists. The record indicates that the most critical times during the liftingcycle occur when the bucket is initially raised and when it is being loweredinto position for unloading. Therefore, employees must be kept out fromunder concrete buckets while buckets are being elevated or lowered intoposition.At other times, i.e., when the bucket is suspended over workers while inroute to its placement destination, OSHA believes that employers must takeother steps to eliminate or minimize employee exposure. OSHA has determinedthat total evacuation of the structure, while obviously an effective wayto eliminate or minimize the hazard, is not always a practical alternative.However, OSHA has determined that other employer efforts to control thehazard are capable of being done and must be taken. Thus, OSHA is requiringthat the employer, to the extent practical, select a routing path so thatno employee, or the fewest number of employees, are exposed to the hazardof falling concrete buckets.Additionally, OSHA observes that other requirements in the constructionstandards which pertain to rigging equipment must also be observed to affordthe greatest level of safety to workers who are working beneath suspendedloads. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraphs (e)(1) and (e)(2) as revised.Paragraph (f) of the final rule contains requirements for personal protectiveequipment. Paragraph (f)(1) requires the employer to prohibit employeesfrom applying a cement, sand, and water mixture through a pneumatic hoseunless the employee is wearing protective head and face equipment. Thisparagraph was relocated from andSection; 1926.703(c) of the proposal andis based on existing andSection; 1926.700(d)(9). OSHA proposed that nozzlemenwho are applying a cement, sand, and water mixture through a pneumatichose shall be required to wear protective head and face equipment.The final rule is essentially the same as the proposed requirement exceptthe word ``nozzlemen'' was replaced with ``employees.'' There was onlyone comment received on the proposed provision, and that was from the NCA(Ex. 14-36) who suggested that OSHA delete the words ``be required to.''OSHA observes that to remove these words as NCA suggests, would createlanguage similar to the language that the BCTD objected when it was usedin proposed andSection; 1926.703(b) (relocated to andSection; 1926.701(d)(1))which prohibits employees from riding concrete buckets. The BCTD took objectionto the proposed provision regarding concrete buckets because they feltthe way the provision was written made it appear that OSHA was placingresponsibility for safety and health with the worker, rather than the employer.Although it has been clearly established that the employer is responsiblefor compliance with the OSHA requirements, OSHA revised the provision forriding concrete buckets so that there would be no misunderstanding thatit is the employer who must prohibit such tasks. Thus, to accept the NCAsuggestion in this provision would be to restructure the provision so thatit would appear that it was the responsibility of the employee to wearpersonal protective equipment. Therefore, OSHA rejects the suggestion ofthe NCA, and instead promulgates paragraph (f)(1) as revised by rewritingthe provision in plain language to state that no employee shall be permittedto apply a cement, sand, and water mixture through a pneumatic hose unlessthe employee is wearing protecting head and face equipment.Paragraph (f)(2) requires that the employer prohibit employees from placingand tying reinforcing steel more than six feet above any adjacent workingsurface unless the employee is protected by the use of a safety belt orequivalent fall protection in accordance with Subpart E of this part. Thisparagraph was located from andSection; 1926.702(b) of the proposal, and isbased on existing andSection; 1926.700(b)(1) which requires that employeesworking more than six feet above any adjacent working surface, placingand tying reinforcing steel in walls, piers, columns, etc., be providedwith a safety belt or equivalent device in accordance with Subpart E ofthis part. OSHA proposed to delete the words ``in walls,'' ``piers,'' ``columns,''``etc,'' and the phrase ``in accordance with Subpart E of this part.''In addition, the words ``provided with'' were replaced with ``protectedby the use of'' and the word ``device'' was replaced with ``protection.''No comments were received on exact revisions proposed except the deletionof the reference to Subpart E. The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) recommended that referenceto Subpart E be retained in the rule to provide employers with guidanceregarding what protective measures are considered equivalent to safetybelts. Finding merit in this argument, OSHA has incorporated this comment.Other comments received including comments from the MCISC (Ex. 14-19) andthe Associated General Contractors of America (AGC) (Ex. 14-31). Both theMSISC and the AGC commented that fall protection should begin at heightsgreater than 10 feet. The commenters stated that this height would bringthe proposal into conformance with other existing fall protection standards.However, only andSection; 1926.451(a)(4), which requires guardrails on scaffolds,contains such a 10-foot rule. All other fall protection requirements providethat employees be provided with fall protection equipment when they aresix feet or more above lower levels, except for roofers performing built-uproofing work.In connection with the proposed provision, OSHA requested, in Issue andplusmin;5of the NPRM, specific comment on what requirements are needed to protectemployees while climbing erected reinforcing steel. OSHA explained thatemployees are often required to climb reinforcing steel during constructionand their weight could cause the steel connections to break, thus exposingthe employees to fall hazards. Through review of the comments on this issue,OSHA sought to determine whether additional requirements are necessaryto protect workers who place and tie reinforcing steel in vertical structures.OSHA received 14 comments on this issue. Ten commenters (Exs. 14-2, 14-8,14-16, 14-20, 14-28, 14-31, 14-33, 14-35, 14-40, and 14-45) stated thatemployees who climb erected reinforcing steel are adequately protectedby the proposed rule. For example, the BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented, ``** * safety belts or equivalent protection, as required by paragraph .702(b),will adequately protect employees who must climb the steel.'' Two commenters(Exs. 14-1 and 14-27) stated that recommendations on typical reinforcingwire size, number of turns, and frequency of ties could be made. Finally,two commenters (Exs. 14-28 and 14-29) stated that work platforms couldbe erected to support the workers.After careful consideration of the comments received, OSHA decided thatno additional requirements were needed in this Subpart to protect employeeswhile they erect reinforcing steel. While it is true that OSHA could specifythe number of turns and the frequency of ties to be made, and OSHA couldrequire the erection of work platforms which in turn could enhance employeesafety, OSHA observes that such requirements would require employers toexpose other employees to the same hazard for a greater period of timeto provide a safer work station for the employees placing and tying reinforcingsteel. For this reason, OSHA has determined that paragraph (f)(2) willbe promulgated as revised with no change to the provision as proposed,except to restructure it so the provision, as discussed above, clearlyplaces the responsibility for safety with the employer rather than theemployee. Further discussion of this topic can be found in the proposedfall protection rule andSection; 1926.501(b)(5). (See 51 FR 42737.)Issue andplusmin;6 of the proposed rule was not directly related to any particularprovision in the general requirements section. Rather, it was raised sothat OSHA could gain specific comment on whether or not it should requireemployers to have engineers inspect concrete construction operations. OSHAexplained in the NPRM that concrete construction operations are often inspectedby engineers and local building officials to evaluate conformance withplans, specifications, and building codes. OSHA sought information to determinewhether engineering inspections would improve worker safety. There wereseveral comments in response to Issue andplusmin;6. Seven commenters (Exs.14-8, 14-10, 14-21, 14-31, 14-33, 14-36, and 14-45) stated that engineeringinspections would not improve worker safety. For example, the NationalConstructors Association (NCA) (Ex. 14-36) stated that concrete employersare in the best position to affect job site conditions positively and immediatelybecause of their direct involvement and observations. Also, Dun-Par (Ex.14-10) stated that most engineers are experts at design and not expertsat construction safety, suggesting that the concrete employer is more knowledgeablein construction safety matters. The other commenters voiced similar concerns.Three commenters (Exs. 14-17, 14-40, and 14-42) stated that engineeringinspections would improve worker safety. For example, C.K. Stope (Ex. 14-17)commented as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * enforcement of construction procedures should be shared by thedesigner, the constructor, and the owner of the completed project. Especially,for unique structures, the designer and the constructor understand therequirements for this specific type of construction and they are boundto provide a safe work place. The owner also would normally share in thisresponsibility.</ITAG>After careful consideration of the comments on this issue, OSHA has determinedthat convincing record evidence does not exist that engineering inspectionsas stated in Issue andplusmin;6 would improve worker safety. Therefore, nofurther action was taken with regard to Issue andplusmin;6.Section 1926.702 Requirements for equipment and tools.This section of the final rule contains specific requirements to addressthe hazards associated with equipment and tools used in concrete and masonryconstruction. The format of the final rule is different from the proposedrule. In the proposed rule, OSHA had placed all concrete equipment requirementsin andSection; 1926.704, while masonry equipment requirements were placedin andSection; 1926.707 along with other masonry requirements. The finalrule relocates all requirements related to equipment and tools used inboth concrete and masonry construction into the same section_andSection;1926.702. As each provision is discussed, its paragraph location in theproposed standard will be noted to facilitate comparison between the proposedand final standards.Paragraph (a)(1) of the final rule contains two requirements related tocement storage facilities. The provisions in paragraphs (a)(1)(i) and (a)(1)(ii)require that bulk storage bins, containers or silos be equipped with conicalor tapered bottoms, and mechanical or pneumatic means to start the flowof material. The intent for these provisions is to eliminate the need toplace employees inside a storage facility to start the flow of materials,thereby exposing employees to suffocation or injury.These requirements are identical to the provision in andSection; 1926.704(a)of the proposed standard, and differs from the existing standard only informatting (i.e., two paragraphs instead of one). The reason for the reformattingis to clarify the requirements by enabling employers to identify quicklyand easily their obligations under the standard.OSHA received only one comment on the proposed paragraph. The WMACSA (Ex.14-29) commented that OSHA had based its existing standard on the ANSIA10.9-1970, but that OSHA has changed an ``or'' used in the ANSI standard(to separate the two equipment requirements) to an ``and'' in the existingstandard. OSHA notes that a review of the ANSI A10.9-1970, the originalsource standard, did not reveal the change alleged by WMACSA. Therefore,since there was no substantive comment on this provision, OSHA promulgatesparagraph (a)(1) as proposed.Paragraph (a)(2) of the final rule prohibits employees from entering storagefacilities unless the ejection system has been shut down, locked out, andtagged to indicate that it is unsafe to operate the ejection system. Thisis a revision of proposed andSection; 1926.704(b) which only required theemployer to shut down and lock out the ejection system. The proposed ruledid not require a tag to be used in conjunction with the lockout procedure.As explained in the proposed rule, the existing standard did not specificallycontain a requirement to shut down and lock out the storage facility, butit did require compliance with the ANSI A10.9-1970 which contained thisrequirement.OSHA received several comments on this provision. One commenter, the WMACSA(Ex. 14-29), said that ``Allowance should be made for access to repairthe ejection system, with proper safeguards, when adjustments are needed.''However, the WMACSA did not make any recommendations on what the propersafeguards should be. Another commenter, the NCA (Ex. 14-36), suggestedthat OSHA consider protecting employees who enter storage facilities fromsinking into material present on the inside of the facility. The NCA alsodid not make any specific recommendations on the type of protection needed.OSHA notes, however, that Subpart H, andSection; 1926.250(b)(2), containsa requirement that employees working on stored material in silos, hoppers,tanks, and similar storage areas shall be equipped with lifelines and safetybelts meeting the requirements of Subpart E of Part 1926.In addition to the above comments, OSHA received a comment from the NationalInstitute for Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) (Ex. 14-39). NIOSHstated that OSHA should be consistent with its other lockout requirements,noting that OSHA requires tags to be used in conjunction with other proposedlockout procedures such as those set forth in andSection; 1926.704(k) ofthe proposal, but yet had only required locking out of ejection systems.OSHA agrees with NIOSH that tags should have been included in the proposalin order to provide a proper level of protection to employees. Additionally,OSHA is specifying that the tags should indicate that the equipment isnot to be operated. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (a)(2) as revised.Paragraph (b) of the final rule contains two requirements relating to concretemixers. Paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2) require that employers equip concretemixers that have one cubic yard or larger loading skips with a mechanicaldevice to clear the skip of materials, and that guardrails should be erectedon each side of the skip. The intent of these requirements is to protectemployees from the hazards associated with the manual clearing of materialsfrom the skip, and to prevent employees from entering the area beneaththe skip while the skip is elevated. These requirements are identical tothe provisions of proposed andSection; 1926.704 (c)(1) and (c)(2), whichare not substantively different from the existing standard. The only differenceis that the proposed paragraph was rewritten for clarity, eliminating someof the introductory text. The substantive portion of the provision hasnot been altered.One comment was received on these provisions. The WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) saidthat the ``skip'' type of mixer is not normally used on building construction.However, WMACSA did not make any recommendation as to whether OSHA shouldmake some change based on their comment. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraphs(b)(1) and (b)(2) as proposed.Paragraph (c) of the final rule requires that employers equip manually-guidedpowered and rotating type concrete troweling machines with a control switchthat will automatically shut off the power whenever the operator removeshis or her hands from the equipment handles. The intent of this requirementis to prevent unattended powered concrete troweling machines from strikingemployees, or otherwise causing injury. This requirement is identical tothe provision in andSection; 1926.704(d) of the proposed standard, and isalso identical to the existing standard. Since there were no comments receivedon this requirement, OSHA promulgates paragraph (c) as proposed.Paragraph (d) of the final rule requires the employer to ensure that concretebuggy handles do not extend beyond the wheels on either side of the buggy.The intent of this requirement is to ensure that buggy handles do not contactother objects, causing employee injury. This requirement is identical tothe provision in andSection; 1926.704(e) of the proposal. The proposed standarddiffers from the existing standard in that OSHA proposed to delete a sentencefrom the existing rule which <T3>recommended</T3> that knuckle guards be installed on buggy handles.OSHA stated in the proposed rule that it believes knuckle guards are unnecessarybecause the hazard of employee contact with fixed objects would be eliminatedif the buggy handles were not extended beyond the wheels on either sideof the buggy.There were three comments on this requirement. WMACSA, NIOSH, and BCTD(Exs. 14-29, 14-39, and 14-40) indicated that even if the buggy handleswere positioned so that they did not extend beyond the wheels, an employeecould still be injured. In particular, the WMACSA stated, ``This becomesimportant on a power buggy where a blow could affect control.''These comments prompted OSHA to seek additional comment in the hearingnotice on concrete buggy handles. In the notice, OSHA stated that one commenterrecommended that knuckle guards be installed to prevent injury while theconcrete buggy is turning. OSHA sought injury data to demonstrate thatconcrete buggies without knuckle guards present a hazard to employees.OSHA received no comment on the request for injury data. Additionally,Ingvar Schousboe (Ex. 14-19) said, ``I have not seen a power buggy in usefor many years. I have not seen or heard of knuckle injuries in connectionwith hand buggies.'' As no injury data was received to justify a requirementfor knuckle guards, OSHA promulgates paragraph (d) as proposed.Paragraph (e) of the final rule contains two requirements relating to concretepumping systems. The first requirement in paragraph (e)(1) requires employersto provide pipe supports, which are designed for 100 percent overload,on concrete pumping systems using discharge pipes. The intent of this provisionis to prevent the pipes from collapsing. The second requirement in paragraph(e)(2) requires employers to use positive, fail-safe joint connectors oncompressed air hoses. The intent of this provision is to prevent separationof compressed air hose sections. These two requirements are identical toproposed provisions andSection; 1926.704 (f) and (g), and are the same asthe existing requirements for concrete pumping systems in existing andSection;1926.701(d)(6).There was one comment on paragraph (e), and that related to the provisionin paragraph (e)(1). The Southern Co. Services (Ex. 14-15) commented thatthe requirement for 100 percent overload for supports seemed excessiveexcept in some instances. The commenter did not, however, make any specificrecommendation for preventing pipe collapse. OSHA believes the requirementto be reasonable and, lacking any substantive information or evidence tothe contrary, promulgates paragraph (e) as proposed. Paragraph (e) is substantiallyidentical to the existing standard and creates no new burdens.Paragraph (f) of the final rule contains two requirements relating to concretebuckets. The first requirement in paragraph (f)(1) requires that positivesafety latches or similar safety devices be installed on concrete bucketswhich are equipped with hydraulic or pneumatic gates to prevent prematureor accidental dumping. The second requirement in paragraph (f)(2) requiresthat concrete buckets be designed to prevent concrete from hanging up onthe top and the sides. These two requirements are identical to proposedprovisions andSection; 1926.704 (h) and (i), which are revisions of existingrequirements. In the proposed rule, OSHA explained that the existing standardrequires concrete buckets to be equipped with positive safety latches orsimilar safety devices to prevent the accumulation of aggregate and loosematerials on the top and sides of the buckets. However, the requirementwas not clearly stated in the existing standard. The purpose of the safetylatches is to prevent premature or accidental dumping and not to preventthe accumulation of aggregate and loose material. To clarify the intentof the provision and to continue the requirement to prevent the accumulationof aggregate and loose material, OSHA proposed to revise the existing standardby creating two provisions, each addressing a different hazard associatedwith the concrete buckets.There were no comments on the proposed provisions. However, NIOSH (Ex.14-39) commented on the preamble discussion of why concrete buckets mustbe designed to prevent material from hanging up on the top and sides. NIOSHsuggested that OSHA erred in stating in the preamble to the proposed rulethat the reason buckets should be designed to prevent material from hangingup is to prevent loose material from falling onto workers. NIOSH suggestedthat the reason buckets should be so designed is to prevent an employeefrom having to enter the buckets to loosen materials that have become attachedto the sides. OSHA agrees that the provision is also intended to preventemployees from having to enter the bucket. However, no change to the languageis necessary to respond to NIOSH's concern and, therefore, OSHA promulgatesparagraph (f) as proposed.Paragraph (g) of the final rule requires employers to secure sections oftremies and similar concrete conveyances with wire rope (or equivalentmaterial) in addition to the regular couplings or connections. This requirementis identical to proposed andSection; 1926.704(j), which was based on theANSI A10.9-1970 standard. The requirement is intended to prevent separationof sections of tremies and similar concrete conveyances. Although the ANSIstandard does not specify materials other than wire rope for use in preventingthe separation of the sections, OSHA, as discussed in the proposed rule,feels that other materials, such as steel chains, could be used to securethe sections. There were no comments received on the proposed paragraph.In light of the above, OSHA promulgates paragraph (g) as proposed.Paragraph (h) of the final rule requires that when bull floats are usedwhere they could contact energized electrical conductors, the bull floathandles shall be constructed of nonconductive material or insulated witha nonconductive sheath whose electrical and mechanical characteristicsprovide the equivalent protection of a handle constructed of nonconductivematerial. It is the same provision as existing andSection; 1926.700(d)(3).OSHA had proposed to delete the existing requirement for bull float handles.OSHA proposed this deletion because the requirement addresses electricalhazards while using bull floats, and electrical hazards are already addressedby andSection; 1926.400 of the construction standards.OSHA received only one comment on the proposed deletion of this requirement.The commenter, BCTD (Ex. 14-40), objected to OSHA's removal of this provisionfor several reasons. The BCTD recommended that OSHA retain the requirementsfor bull floats, stating the following:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * we believe it is more effective to make the standards for aparticular industry or operation as comprehensive as possible, rather thanrelying on the employer to be equally familiar with the standards for allconstruction. The operation with which the employer is here concerned isthe placement of concrete_an operation seemingly unrelated to electricalwork. It is more likely that workers will be protected if the provisionrequiring insulation of bull float handles is included in Subpart Q, withother standards with which the employer is concerned, than if the employermust refer to Subpart K.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">OSHA acknowledges that Subpart K, the electrical standards, does notspecifically mention bull float handles and that in the interest of employeeprotection OSHA should retain the more specific requirement as it appearsin the existing standard. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (h) asit appears in the existing standard.Paragraph (i) of the final rule contains two requirements relating to masonrysaws. Paragraph (i)(1) requires that the saws be guarded with a semi-circularenclosure over the blade. Paragraph (i)(2) requires that a method of retainingfragments of shattered blades be incorporated into the enclosure. The intentof these requirements is to prevent contact between the employee and theblade or blade fragments. The requirement in paragraph (i)(1) is identicalto proposed andSection; 1926.707(b)(1)(i). However, the requirement in paragraph(i)(2) differs from the requirement in proposed andSection; 1926.707(b)(1)(ii).In the proposed rule OSHA required that masonry saws be guarded with asemicircular enclosure over the blade and that a slotted horizontal hingedbar be mounted underneath the guard enclosure to retain fragments of shatteredblades.OSHA received several comments concerning the provisions required for masonrysaws (Exs. 14-3, 14-14, 14-19, 14-24, and 14-26). These commenters saidthe proposed language would render most saws in violation of the regulationsbecause masonry saws are no longer manufactured with the ``slotted hingedbar mounted underneath the guard'' as prescribed in the proposed standard.In addition to these comments, testimony was presented at the public hearingby George Miller, representing the Mason Contractors Association of America(Tr. I, 162 and 168), reaffirming the written comments and informing OSHAof the problematic ramifications of such a specification. OSHA finds meritwith the commenters' position and has revised the requirement to allowany method which achieves the stated performance_to retain blade fragments.OSHA believes the revised language responds to the concerns of the commentersand also allows the Agency to address the hazards appropriately. Therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraph (i)(1) as proposed, and paragraph (i)(2) asrevised.Paragraph (j) of the final rule requires the employer to lock out and tagequipment before allowing employees to perform any activities such as maintenanceor repairs where unexpected, inadvertent operation could occur and causeinjury. The intent of this requirement is to prevent employee injury dueto operation of equipment by persons who may be unaware that an employeeis maintaining or repairing the equipment.In proposed andSection; 1926.704(k), OSHA has essentially the same requirement,except that it was not clear that lockout/tagout was only being requiredwhere a potentially hazardous situation existed. And, the proposal madeno distinction between a ``repair'' versus a ``maintenance'' activity.The final rule differs from the proposed rule in that it clarifies thedeficiencies in the proposed language as outlined above.There were three comments on the proposed requirement. The PCA (Ex. 14-9)commented that OSHA should change <T3>cement </T3>pumps to concrete pumps. OSHA notes that it based the proposedrequirement on an ANSI provision which was directed specifically to cementpumps at bulk cement transfer facilities. In addition, OSHA relied on anotherANSI provision which required other equipment such as compressors, mixers,conveyors, screens, etc., to be locked and tagged out prior to making repairs.By combining these two ANSI provisions, OSHA intended to require that anypiece of equipment that could be inadvertently started up and possiblycause employee injury, be locked out and tagged before employees are permittedto perform maintenance or repair work. Since OSHA does not wish to causeany confusion, the word ``cement'' has been deleted in the final rule sothe requirement will apply to any pump where the hazard of inadvertentoperation is present. OSHA notes that this revision is not a substantivechange because the proposed requirement applied to all equipment and mentionedcement pumps only as an example of equipment addressed by the provision.The NCA (Ex. 14-36) commented that OSHA should strike the general requirementto lock out equipment, leaving only the requirement for tags. They furthersuggested substitute language to require equipment to be locked out inaddition to the tag if the power supply has facilities for lockout. TheNCA supported their comment by pointing out that some equipment, such asliquid fuel powered compressors, pumps and mixers are started by a pullrope. OSHA realizes from this comment that some confusion could resultfrom the wording used in the proposed requirement. Specifically, employersmay be under the false impression that it was OSHA's intent in the proposalthat all equipment be locked out and tagged before work was performed onthe equipment, regardless of the presence of a hazard, when in fact OSHAintended to impose the requirement only when a potential hazard existed.It is OSHA's belief that most equipment operated by a pull rope would notexpose an employee to a hazard as a result of inadvertent operation and,if that were the situation, lockout/tagout measures would not be required.However, such equipment may need to be shut down prior to making repairsor performing maintenance. Because of the apparent confusion, OSHA hasrevised this provision by rewording it in the final rule to reflect moreclearly the intent of the provision and the action to be taken when thehazard of inadvertent activation is present.A final comment received from NIOSH (Ex. 14-39) questioned whether workersentering mixers to chip out dried concrete would be performing a ``repair,''implying that OSHA may have overlooked this kind of ``maintenance'' activitywhen restricting the lockout/tagout measures to equipment being ``repaired.''It was, and is, OSHA's intent to protect employees who enter mixers (orany other equipment) for any reason from the inadvertent activation ofequipment. To further clarify OSHA's intent, OSHA has revised the proposedrequirement to include all activities, including maintenance and repair.Additionally, OSHA is specifying what information should be included onthe tag to eliminate any misunderstanding. Upon consideration of all thecomments, OSHA promulgates paragraph (j) as revised.Section 1926.703 Requirements for cast-in-place concrete. Section 1926.703 presents the requirements for cast-in-place concrete.This section addresses formwork in general, shoring and reshoring, verticalslip forms, reinforcing steel, and removal of formwork. The requirementsof this section were relocated from proposed andSection; 1926.705 (Formwork)and from proposed paragraph (c) of andSection; 1926.702 (Reinforcing Steel)to promote a more logically organized standard. Paragraph (a) of the final rule contains the general requirements applicableto all formwork. The intent of these requirements is to prevent accidentssuch as the one that occurred on September 29, 1978, in which one employeewas killed. In that accident, an employee was removing the cables suspendedfrom a crane which temporarily held a section of concrete formwork in place.The formwork fell on the employee after the cables were removed. The formworkwas not properly braced to prevent collapse (Ex. 8). Observance of theexisting requirements in andSection; 1926.701(a)(1) could have preventedthis accident. Likewise, observance of the final rule requirements in thisparagraph will prevent these types of accidents. Paragraph (a)(1) requires formwork (which has been defined to mean thetotal system of support including forms, shores, reshores, hardware andbraces) to be designed, fabricated, erected, supported, braced, and maintainedso that it is capable of supporting without failure all vertical and lateralloads that may reasonably be anticipated to be applied to the formwork.This provision was relocated from andSection; 1926.705(a)(1) of the proposalwhich was based on the existing provision in andSection; 1926.701(a)(1).OSHA observes that the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard contains an essentiallysimilar provision in section 7.1.1. OSHA also observes that the ANSI A10.9-1983standard contains a number of specific provisions designed to guide employerson how to meet this general, performance requirement. In particular, formworksafety factors are prescribed for various types of shoring systems. Infact, OSHA has indicated in the final rule that formwork which has beendesigned, fabricated, erected, supported, braced and maintained in conformancewith the ANSI requirements in sections 6 and 7 for Formwork and Shoringshall be deemed to meet the requirements of this paragraph. However, theANSI standard does not provide all the information necessary to meet completelythe requirements of andSection; 1926.703(a)(1); i.e., the ANSI standard doesnot specify every detail of formwork design, fabrication, erection, support,bracing, and maintenance. Therefore, the employer is still responsiblefor the design, fabrication, erection, support, bracing and maintenanceof formwork to ensure that it meets the requirements of andSection; 1926.703(a)(1).OSHA believes the ANSI standard will be of particular assistance in guidingsmaller employers who may not engage the services of formwork designersor engineers. The existing rule, similar to the final rule, requires formwork <T3>and shoring</T3> to be ``designed, erected, supported, braced, andmaintained so that it will <T3>safely</T3> support all vertical and lateral loads that may be imposed<T3>upon it during placement of concrete.''</T3> OSHA proposed to revisethe existing requirement by deleting the words ``and shoring'' and ``safely''and by deleting the phrase ``upon it during place of concrete'' [emphasizedabove]. OSHA proposed to delete the words ``and shoring'' because it hadproposed to define formwork as inclusive of ``shoring.'' OSHA proposedto delete the word ``safely'' because it is a term that cannot be definedwith sufficient clarity to be of benefit to employers in complying withthe provisions of this paragraph, nor does the word ``safely'' clarifythe rule to a measurable degree greater than the language used in the finalrule. Finally, OSHA proposed to delete the phrase ``upon it during placementof concrete'' because OSHA's intent is that formwork support anticipatedloads at all times, not just during the placement of concrete. OSHA received no comment on the specific revisions it proposed. However,comments were received to suggest that further revision was necessary.Three commenters (Exs. 14-9, 14-36, and 18) suggested that the phrase ``thatmay be imposed'' in the proposed standard should be replaced with a phrasesuch as ``normally expected loads,'' ``intended loads'' or ``normal loads''to indicate clearly the loads for which the formwork must be designed tosupport. OSHA agrees that the proposed language may be misinterpreted asrequiring employers to design, fabricate, erect, support, brace and maintainformwork to support loads <T3>beyond</T3> those which the employer can reasonably anticipate willbe applied to the formwork. Therefore, OSHA has revised the provision bysubstituting the language ``may reasonably be anticipated'' to describethe loads which the formwork must support. Other comments were received concerning formwork safety factors and designresponsibilities. The WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) commented that OSHA should includethe minimum factors of design that are covered in ANSI A10.9-1983 (Ex.11). The Scaffolding, Shoring, and Forming Institute (SSFI) (Ex. 14-44) alsocommented on the need to include formwork safety factors. In addition,a representative from the SSFI testified (Ex. 21 and Tr. I, 173-174) thathe felt very strongly that specific safety factors must be included withinthe body of the standards, stressing that these safety factors are neededto provide additional protection for unknown loads that may be imposed.He also noted that safety factors have been part of the ANSI standardsto which OSHA referred but were not included in the proposed standard.When asked if he were aware of any circumstances where safety factors wouldhave prevented worker injury had they been adhered to, the SSFI representativereplied, ``Well it's my feeling that the safety factors are presently adheredto. If the standard doesn't have a safety factor, then I would be afraidthat the contractor is going to start cutting into the safety factors anddesigning to a 1 to 1 safety factor, and then we're going to see a rashof accidents.'' (<T3>Id.</T3>) On the other hand, OSHA's expert witness, John Hanson, (Ex. 18) statedthe following: <ITAG tagnum="21">I believe that there is a strong tendency in construction, unfortunately,to not pay sufficient attention to shoring. An approach that is often taken,and accepted, is to use a larger-than-customary factor of safety in designof the formwork, and pay less attention to details. Experience shows, however,that the details are essential to safety. In the case in which I was involved,compliance with (a)(1) would have prevented the failure. In my view, bracingis the most essential requirement. </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">OSHA has not included specific requirements for formwork safety factorsin the final rule. However, as stated above, the ANSI A10.9-1983 standarddoes prescribe formwork safety factors, among other recommendations, whichthe employer may use as a guide in meeting the provisions of this paragraph.OSHA notes that it did not propose any safety factors in the NPRM, althoughsafety factors were required in the existing standard through referenceto the 1970 ANSI A10.9 standard. The removal of requirements for safetyfactors in the NPRM prompted little information or evidence in the formof written comments or testimony. In fact, the record shows that when formworksafety factors were discussed, the result was disagreement over what theproper factors of safety should be (Tr. I, 192). Additionally, OSHA believes the performance language of the final ruleprovides for the proper level of employee protection. OSHA observes, onceagain, that this paragraph requires that formwork be capable of supporting<T3>without failure</T3> all vertical and lateral loads that may reasonablybe anticipated to be applied to the formwork. OSHA believes the languageof the final rule states clearly the employer's obligation while allowingthe employer to determine how to accomplish the stated performance. IfOSHA were to specify safety factors for each type of shoring, employersmay falsely believe that they have met their obligations in so far as compliancewith the general requirements for formwork by simply adhering to the specifiedsafety factors. Employers must decide whether or not to use the safetyfactors prescribed by ANSI or the SSFI, or to vary from those factors asthey believe necessary so long as formwork can meet the regulatory intent_tosupport without failure. OSHA interprets ``without failure'' to mean thebreakage and separation of any component part of the formwork system orload refusal, which is the point where the ultimate strength of a componentis exceeded. This is the point where structural members lose their abilityto carry loads. Therefore, OSHA believes the revised language properlystates the expected level of performance for the total formwork systemwithout being overly specific. Finally, BCTD (Ex. 14-40) suggested that OSHA require formwork to be designedby the structural engineer and included in the original construction specifications.The BCTD explained that such a requirement coupled with a requirement forthe engineer to determine what testing is appropriate to determine whenformwork may be stripped will address both structural integrity and workersafety, since both concerns will be integrated into the underlying design.OSHA has not incorporated the BCTD's suggestion to require that all formworkbe designed by a structural engineer. This decision is based on OSHA'sdetermination that the requirement of the final rule very clearly statesthe performance to be achieved by the employer with regard to formworkand, as stated above, that the employer must decide how best to complywith the stated performance. Additionally, there was no evidence submittedto the record to demonstrate a danger to employee safety if employers werenot required to have all formwork designed by a structural engineer. Also,at the public hearing there was testimony regarding who should be assignedresponsibility for the formwork. A representative from Dun-Par (Tr. II,8), in putting forth his position that the formwork designer or contractorshould have that responsibility rather than an engineer, entered two setsof formwork plans into the record (Ex. 23A and 23B) on which an engineerhad written ``We have no comments on the drawings and calculations in thissubmittal.'' Dun-Par's representative further stated that the specificationsplace responsibility for formwork design on the contractor, a practicewith which he agrees (Tr. II, 9). Finally, the Dun-Par representative said``The engineer doesn't want to be involved in this, and you can't forcehim. They are not the experts in the business [of formwork design].''Furthermore, OSHA notes that the Occupational Safety and Health Act, theprimary responsibility for employee safety rests solely with the employeras it is the employer who has control over the worksite and the authorityto take corrective action when necessary. In the case of formwork design,employers may determine that the only way they can achieve compliance withthis particular requirement is to have a structural engineer design theformwork. In other instances, however, the employer may determine thatthe formwork can be designed by others who are qualified in formwork design,but who are not structural engineers. OSHA believes there may be situationswhere the job is so small and so routine that the employer has the knowledgeand skills necessary to meet the intent of this requirement without theaid of others.After careful consideration of all of the comments and testimony received,OSHA has determined that the rule, as revised, provides proper protectionfor employees while allowing employers flexibility in determining the bestway to provide this protection. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraphs(a)(1) as revised.Paragraph (a)(2) requires that drawings or plans, including all revisions,for the jack layout, formwork (including shoring equipment), working decks,and scaffolds be available at the jobsite. This paragraph has been relocatedfrom proposed andSection; 1926.705(a)(2). It is essentially the same requirementas the proposed rule and the existing rule in andSection; 1926.701(a)(2),except the words ``including all revisions'' has been added. OSHA observesthat a similar provision is prescribed in Section 7.4.9 of ANSI A10.9-1983.OSHA received two written comments, in addition to testimony at the hearing,on this provision. The Technical Safety Associates (TSA) (Ex. 14-34) andSSFI (Ex. 21 and Tr. I, 176) supported the proposed rule. The SSFI testifiedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">The Institute strongly endorses the provisions of 1926.705 that requiredrawings or plans for the jack layout, formwork, shoring, working decksand scaffolding to be available at the job site. Without the drawings orplans immediately accessible at the job site, questions regarding the designand integrity of the forms or shoring layout cannot be properly addressed.</ITAG>WMACSA (Ex. 14-19) commented that the drawings or plans also should reflectall approved changes. OSHA agrees that it is necessary to have completedrawings or plans and that includes all revisions made to the originaldrawings or plans. Therefore, OSHA has added the words ``including allrevisions'' to the provision. Additionally, because OSHA is now definingformwork as a total system, including forms, shores, reshores, braces andhardware, it is not necessary to include the term ``shoring'' which appearsin both the existing and proposed provision. However, in order to be consistentwith the other provisions in this section, OSHA has added the words ``includesshoring equipment'' to avoid any misunderstanding. Therefore, OSHA promulgatesparagraph (a)(2) as revised.Whereas paragraph (a) applies to all formwork, paragraph (b) of the finalrule contains requirements that apply only to shoring and reshoring operations.Paragraph (b)(1) requires that all shoring equipment (including equipmentused in reshoring operations) be inspected prior to erection to determinethat the equipment meets the requirements specified in the formwork drawings.Paragraph (b)(2) prohibits the use of shoring equipment found to be damagedsuch that its strength is reduced to less than that required by andSection;1926.703(a)(1).These provisions were relocated from andSection;andSection; 1926.705(c)(2)(i)and 1926.705(c)(2)(ii) of the proposed rule, which were based on an existingprovision in andSection; 1926.700(e)(1)(iii). OSHA observes that the ANSIA10.9-1983 standard contains essentially similar provisions in Sections6.3.1 and 6.3.2.OSHA proposed to revise the existing rule by replacing the words ``shoringlayout'' with ``formwork drawings'' for clarity, and by setting forth thetwo provisions separately.OSHA did not receive any comment on the changes proposed. However, it didreceive one comment questioning the meaning of ``damaged shoring equipment''as used in paragraph (b)(2). The Portland Cement Association (PCA) (Ex.14-9) stated that the word ``damaged'' was not sufficiently descriptive.Although they did not make any recommendations on how OSHA might describe``damaged'' so that it would be clearly understood by all, they did posetwo hypothetical situations to illustrate their concern. Specifically,PCA questioned whether a notch in a timber post or a small dent in a pipeshore would be considered damaged sufficient to reject its use as shoring.OSHA believes that the employer (or his designated competent person whomakes inspections of equipment as required in andSection; 1926.20(b)(2))should determine whether or not, for example, a notch in a timber postconstituted damage to such an extent that the post could not provide thesupport needed for its role in meeting the requirements of andSection; 1926.703(a)(1).OSHA observes that final rule andSection; 1926.703(a)(1) requires that formwork,now defined to include shoring equipment, be designed, fabricated, erected,supported, braced, and maintained to support all vertical and lateral loadsthat may reasonably be anticipated to be applied to the formwork. Thus,it is OSHA's intent that if the employer cannot ensure that the shoringequipment, which is part of the total formwork system, will provide thesupport necessary for its role in the overall formwork system because ithas a notch in it, then the equipment cannot be used for shoring. OSHAhas included language in the final rule to clarify this point. OSHA believesthat with the revised language, employers will understand the requirementin (b)(2) and thus be able to determine whether or not shoring has beendamaged to such an extent that its use for shoring is questionable.Additionally, paragraph (b)(1) has been revised to indicate that shoringequipment includes equipment used in reshoring operations. This provisionwas made simply to serve as a reminder that equipment used in reshoringoperations are also subject to the requirements of this paragraph. Therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2) as revised.Paragraph (b)(3) of the final rule requires that erected shoring equipmentbe inspected immediately prior to, during, and immediately after the placementof concrete.The final rule is identical to the proposed rule in andSection; 1926.705(c)(3)(i)and the existing rule in andSection; 1926.700(e)(1)(iv). OSHA observes thatthe final rule is also consistent with Section 6.3.3. of the ANSI A10.9-1983standard.Only one comment was received on this provision. The SSFI stated (Tr. I,177) that ``With respect to 1926.705(c)(3), it is the Institute's interpretationthat those provisions require the contractor to inspect shoring equipment* * * to assure that the shoring complies with the shoring layout.'' OSHAobserves that in the NPRM it was stated that the purpose of this provisionis to determine if any shoring equipment has been damaged or weakened afterit had been erected and that andSection; 1926.703(b)(1) requires inspectionto determine that the shoring is as specified in the formwork drawings.Therefore, there being no substantive comment made on this provision, OSHApromulgates paragraph (b)(3) as proposed.Paragraph (b)(4) of the final rule requires that erected shoring equipment(again, shoring equipment includes equipment used for reshoring) foundto be damaged or weakened, such that its strength is reduced to less thanrequired by andSection; 1926.703(a)(1), be immediately reinforced.This paragraph is essentially the same as proposed andSection; 1926.705(c)(3)(ii)and existing andSection; 1926.700(e)(1)(iv) except it is more clearly written.OSHA observes that Section 6.3.6 of the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard containsan essentially similar provision.The final rule differs from the proposed rule in that the words ``or reshored''used in the proposed and existing rules as an alternate to the word ``reinforced,''are not carried forward to the final rule and the meaning of the terms``damaged or weakened'' has been clarified.The elimination of the words ``or reshored'' was made in response to theCeco (Ex. 14-45) comment that the word ``reshored'' was misleading. Cecofelt that the requirement to reshore damaged equipment might be confusedwith the reshoring operation performed after the removal of shores andforms. Ceco also said the concept of immediate reinforcement would be adequateto communicate the correct response. OSHA agrees with Ceco that the useof the word ``reshored'' could cause confusion, especially since OSHA hasnoted that equipment used for reshoring is also subject to this requirement.Therefore, OSHA has removed the term ``reshored'' from the final rule.Another commenter, SSFI (Ex. 14-44) said that OSHA needed to modify thelanguage of the proposed provision ``to insure the degree of appropriatereinforcement.'' Specifically, the SSFI suggested that OSHA revise thelanguage to read, `` * * * reinforced, reshored, or replaced to carry itsmaximum intended loads that may be imposed.''Again, OSHA reminds employers that the general requirement for formworkin andSection; 1926.703(a)(1) must be met and the requirement in this provision,which is specific to shoring, is only part of the total effort that anemployer must put forth to achieve compliance with the requirement forformwork to be `` * * * capable of support without failure all * * * loads* * * applied to the formwork.'' In order to address the concerns of theSSFI and the concern raised by the PCA and discussed in andSection; 1926.703(b)(2)regarding the meaning of ``damaged,'' OSHA has included language to clarifythe meaning of damaged or weakened shoring equipment. OSHA believes thismakes it clear that when the employer determines that it is necessary toreinforce erected shoring, it is for the purpose of insuring that the strengthof the shoring meets the requirements of andSection; 1926.703(a)(1). Therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(4) as revised.Paragraph (b)(5) of the final rule requires that sills for shoring be sound,rigid, and capable of carrying the maximum intended load. This provisionis identical to proposed andSection; 1926.705(c)(1) and existing andSection;1926.700(e)(1)(ii). OSHA observes that the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard containsa similar provision in Section 6.2.6. OSHA received no comments on theproposed rule, indicating to OSHA that commenters, like OSHA, find meritwith the existing rule. OSHA, therefore, promulgates paragraph (b)(5) asproposed.Paragraph (b)(6) of the final rule requires that all base plates, shoreheads, extension devices and adjustment screws be in firm contact withthe foundation and the form. This paragraph is identical to proposed andSection;1926.705(c)(4). The proposed paragraph was a combination of existing rulesfor tubular welded frame shoring in andSection; 1926.700(e)(v), tube andcoupler shoring in andSection; 1926.701(c)(4), and single post shores inandSection; 1926.701(d)(2)_all of which contain essentially the same requirement.OSHA proposed to combine the existing rules into one rule which then wouldbe applicable to all types of shoring. However, two changes to the resultingrule were proposed. First, OSHA proposed to replace the word ``or'' inthe existing standard with the word ``and'' which clarifies OSHA's regulatoryintent_that the top of the shore is in firm contact with the form materialand that the bottom of the shore is in firm contact at the foundation (formerlyreferred to as the footing sill) of the shore, rather than the presentlyimplied intent that firm contact need be made only at one or the otherend of the shore. And, secondly, OSHA proposed to replace the words ``footingsill'' with ``foundation'' to include other types of shoring supports.OSHA received no comments on the proposed editorial revisions, but it didreceive two written comments and oral testimony at the hearing on the topicof securing shores to both the form and foundation. The PCA (Ex. 14-9)recommended that the proposed rule be revised to read as follows: ``Theends (top or bottom) of the completed shore shall be in firm contact witheither the foundation or the form.'' The PCA, however, did not providea basis or reason for recommending this method of shoring erection. OSHAobserves that this recommendation would provide firm contact only at oneend of the shore, and OSHA believes that both shore ends must be in firmcontact with other surfaces to prevent the shores from falling over orotherwise losing their ability to provide support during concrete placement.The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) recommended that shoring equipment, in order to provideadequate protection, should be ``snugged up'' or secured to the foundationand form, not just in ``firm contact.'' Like the PCA, BCTD failed to statespecifically the reason for their recommendation. OSHA, therefore, decidedto seek additional comment by raising an issue in the hearing notice toelicit information to determine whether it was necessary to secure shoringto the foundation and form.At the hearing, John Hanson, OSHA's expert witness, (Tr. I, p. 91 and Ex.18) testified as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">In my view, the question of whether or not it is necessary to securethe shoring depends on the type of shoring. Some deformation or movementof the formwork should be expected during the casting operation becauseof unbalanced loading or perhaps because of some temporary constructionload. If the shoring is such that it could become loose, and hence be displacedlaterally as a result of the operation, it certainly should be secured.However, if the shoring is such that it is impossible for it to be displacedlaterally or to be rendered ineffective, then securing the shoring is unnecessaryand I would add a statement to that section to that effect.</ITAG>Another OSHA expert witness, Ingvar Schouseboe, in his prepared statement(Ex. 19), commented that the proposed requirement is reasonable becausethe mentioned elements cannot transfer loads in bearing without such contact.He also stated that ``If the loads just mentioned can be counted on alwaysto induce compression in bearing and shores, anchoring to forms and foundationsare theoretically unnecessary.'' At the hearing, Mr. Schouseboe also gavetestimony on this matter, (Tr. I, p. 138) stating the following:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * if the concrete that comes in weighs 15 times as much per squarefoot as the form does, it will indeed lift. But, if it weighs only fivetimes that the form does, it will never lift it * * *. So it depends on* * * whether we are talking about a 4-inch slab or a 12-inch slab * ** .</ITAG>The SSFI (Tr. I, 176) agreed with OSHA that shoring equipment should bein <T3>firm </T3>contact with the foundation and the form. SSFI testifiedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">The Institute agrees that * * * all base plates, shore heads, extensiondevices, and adjustment screws shall be in firm contact with the foundationand the form. In not every case, however, should base plates and headsbe <T3>secured </T3>to the foundation and form unless special engineeringor circumstances warrant such action.</ITAG>Dun-Par (Tr. II, 8) testified, ``Under certain forming conditions you canhave a problem with that, and it should be designed and accounted for underthose conditions. To have a blanket statement that all formwork shouldhave it [securing of the shoring members to the form and foundation] isway beyond reason.''Later, upon cross examination, the Dun-Par representative (Tr. II, 25)said he agreed with the proposal language, but that he disagreed with thelanguage [discussed in the hearing notice] suggesting that ``everythinghad to be attached.''A review of all the comments and testimony received indicated that thereare circumstances under which it may be necessary to ``secure'' shoresat the top and bottom in order to insure that the formwork system doesnot fail. However, since these circumstances vary, depending on severalfactors, it would not be possible for OSHA to identify each situation wheresecuring of the shoring would be necessary. Nonetheless, OSHA believesit has adequately addressed the concerns of the commenters because thegeneral requirement of this section states that formwork (which, as statedbefore, includes shoring) must be able to support ``without failure'' allreasonably anticipated vertical and lateral loads. Through this provision,the Agency feels that it has adequately addressed the employer's obligationwith regard to formwork. Simply meeting the provision of this paragraphfor ``firm contact'' does not release an employer from the obligation tomeet the general requirements for formwork. Thus, when an employer encountersa shoring system that requires ``securing'' rather than ``firm contact,''the employer must secure the formwork, as necessary, so that firm contactis maintained, providing the proper level of employee protection, or theemployer has not met its obligations under andSection; 1926.703(a)(1). Therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(6) as proposed.Paragraph (b)(7) of the final rule prohibits eccentric loads on shore headsand similar members unless these members have been designed for such loading.This paragraph was relocated from andSection; 1926.705(c)(6) of the proposalwhere OSHA proposed to continue the existing rule as referenced in theANSI A10.9-1970 standard (Ex. 9). OSHA observes that section 6 of the ANSIA10.9-1983 standard also contains similar provisions for shoring. The finalrule is essentially the same as the proposed rule except that an editorialrevision_replacing the word ``they'' with the words ``these members'' hasbeen made.OSHA received a comment on this provision from the Patent Scaffolding Company(Ex. 14-41), a member of the SSFI. Patent commented that the proposed provisionhad serious deficiencies and referred OSHA to the SSFI comment for specificdetails. The SSFI (Ex. 14-44) commented that eccentric loads should beprohibited on single post shores because they are relatively unstable.OSHA's expert witness, John Hanson, in his prepared statement (Ex. 18)commented, ``In a technical sense, there is always some eccentricity inthe loading applied to a shore head, if for no other reason than the frictionbetween parts used to introduced the load into the shore head. The intentof the provision is clear, that it is important to avoid significant eccentricityin introducing loads onto a shore head, but to fully satisfy the requirementas now written would be virtually impossible * * *.''OSHA agrees with its expert witness that, in the strictest technical sense,it is impossible to avoid all eccentric loading when loads are introducedonto a shore head. The very act of loading will itself produce eccentricloading. Such eccentric loads are inherent and, normally, incidental tothe eventual total load to be placed on a shoring system. As Mr. Hansontestified, the concern is with ``significant eccentricity;'' that is, eccentricloading which is so large that it is no longer incidental when comparedto the designed and actual capacity of the shoring system. Such loadingcan result when too large an amount of concrete is placed in one area ofthe formwork without proper distribution. Or, it can result when a loadof concrete is placed too rapidly causing an additional shock loading tobe applied. Whatever the cause of this eccentric loading, the term ``significant''is a relative term and is too ambiguous to be incorporated into the languageof the final rule. Instead, OSHA believes that, absent appropriate design,all eccentric loading has the potential of being ``significant.'' It isfor these reasons that OSHA, like ANSI, places a prohibition on eccentricloads on shoreheads unless they have been designed for such loading. OSHAbelieves the requirements of this provision, as proposed, adequately addressworker protection, are readily understood, and that no revision is necessary.Employers are once again reminded that the requirements of this provisionmust be met in conjunction with the general requirements of andSection; 1926.703(a)(1)that formwork must be capable for supporting ``without failure * * *.''Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(7) as revised.Paragraph (b)(8) of the final rule requires that whenever single post shoresare used one on top of another (tiered), the employer shall comply withcertain specific requirements in addition to the general requirements forformwork. These requirements include (i) that the employer shall have aqualified designer prepare the design of the shoring and shall have anengineer, qualified in structural design, inspect the erected shoring system;(ii) that the shore be vertically aligned; (iii) that the shores be splicedto prevent misalignment; and (iv) that the shores be adequately bracedin two mutually perpendicular directions at the splice level and that eachshore (tier) also be diagonally braced in the same two directions. The final rule is considerably different than the proposed rule locatedat andSection; 1926.705(c)(5). The proposed rule, like the existing rule,only required that the layout be designed and inspected by a structuralengineer if single post shores were to be used in more than one tier. Inthe proposed rule, OSHA stated that the intent of this provision is toprevent the collapse of formwork due to improper design and erection ofsingle post shores in more than one tier. OSHA also noted that the AdvisoryCommittee on Construction Safety and Health (ACCSH) and recommended thatOSHA prohibit the use of single post shores in more than one tier (Ex.2, p. 175). Finally, OSHA stated that it had reviewed accident investigationrecords involving the failure of double tiered single post shoring systemsand found that the employer failed to comply with the existing regulations;thereby leading OSHA to believe that single post shores could be used inmore than one tier if they were properly designed and inspected as requiredby the existing regulations. OSHA received a number of comments in response to this provision. The WMACSA(Ex. 14-29) recommended that the term ``structural engineer'' be changedto ``registered engineer.'' The NCA (Ex. 14-41) recommended that ``structuralengineer'' be changed to ``qualified engineer.'' Additionally, severalcomments were received recommending that OSHA prohibit the use of tieredsingle post shores. The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented, ``With regard to proposedsubparagraph .705(c)(5), we concur with the ACCSH recommendation that single-postshoring be prohibited for use on more than one tier.''Mr. Charles W. Borden (Ex. 14-1), the former Corporate Manager of Safetyfor Ceco Corporation, stated, ``It is recommended that the use of singlepost shores in more than one tier be prohibited * * *.'' Mr. Borden supportedhis statement saying that the use of single post shores in more than onetier is an inherently unstable shoring system for formwork. He furtherstated that regardless of the requirement to use a structural engineerto design and inspect this system, it is highly sensitive to any designerror or construction error, and that lateral forces on the system or bucklingof any shore can cause complete failure of the entire shoring system. Mr.Borden also said that this system has caused the most failures in the past30 years. In conclusion, Mr. Borden said that if OSHA approves the useof single post shoring systems, he recommends a full floor be erected betweentiers of this system that has the stability equal to that of the supportson which the first tier of shores is resting, and that the design and inspectionof the system be done by a structural engineer as well as a qualified formworkdesigner. The SSFI (Ex. 14-44) recommended, ``* * * the entire requirement of thissection be deleted and be replaced with a statement prohibiting the useof post shores in more than one tier.'' They further stated that they knewof no manufacturer represented in the SSFI that permits use [of singlepost shores] over one tier and, therefore, do not test equipment for suchconditions. They also said that the complexities of plumbness, bracing,and adjustment of each post shore in each successive tier increase therisk of producing an unstable structure. These comments prompted OSHA to seek additional information on this topicin the hearing notice. OSHA wanted to know whether or not a properly designedand erected tiered single post shoring system can safely transfer loadsto lower levels. In response to the hearing notice, OSHA received written comments and oraltestimony, including the following.  The Construction Safety Association of Ontario (CSAO) (Ex. 14-46) statedthe following:<ITAG tagnum="21">Our experience with single post shoring systems in general and tieredsystems in particular when they were more extensively used, was that theywere extremely sensitive to errors and omissions in construction as wellas errors in design. This is in contrast with more modern techniques suchas shoring frames which are much less sensitive to construction errorsespecially.</ITAG>Ceco Industries, Inc. (Ex. 14-47) commented as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Yes, it is possible to safely design and construct such systems butthey require design knowledge, construction and inspection care far inexcess of what is required for other supporting systems. Systems such asthese have been involved in several failures. Safer alternative methodsare easily constructed. It is recommended that this type of system be prohibited.</ITAG>John Hanson (Ex. 18), OSHA's expert witness, in his prepared testimonycommented as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Single-post shores are certainly capable of safely transferring loadsto lower levels, where those levels are the floors in a building. Thisis a very common method of construction. However, single-post shores maynot be capable of safely transferring loads to lower levels if those levelsare temporary platforms in the construction, which by themselves have noresistance to lateral loading. Indeed, it is difficult for me to conceiveof such a system being used. Thus, it would seem that this section couldbe deleted.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Mr. Hanson also questioned if there was a difference in the structuralengineer referred to in this provision and the engineer referred to inother sections, stating his preference that the requirement call for a``registered engineer'' if that was the intent, otherwise just use ``engineer.''When questioned at the hearing on single-post shores, Mr. Hanson responded,``Single-post shores, themselves, I think, are capable of transferringa certain load from a point above to a point below if that point aboveor for that matter the point below are both properly braced laterally;i.e., if it is between existing floors in a building, I think then thatthose single-post shores will work.'' He also said that if you are puttingone single-post shore on top of another without bracing of that junction,then in his view it would be a violation of the general requirements forformwork. When asked specifically if he thought it was possible to comeup with a design in a construction procedure where one post is put on topof another in an area where a floor is skipped, Mr. Hanson responded, ``Yes,I think anything is possible.'' (Tr. I, 122-123).Ingvar Schousboe (Ex. 19), OSHA's other expert witness, in his preparedstatement said that ``Tiered single-post shores should be properly braced,and it may require an engineer to calculate what constitutes proper bracing.''He also stated that properly braced single-post shores could safely transferloads to lower levels under the following conditions: The posts must beaccurately lined up vertically; spliced to prevent any misalignment; bracedlaterally in two orthogonal directions at the splice level; and, each tiermust be diagonally braced in the same two directions. At the hearing (Tr.I, 139), Mr. Schousboe testified, ``About [the tiering of] single-postshores, I have stated that without any bracing in it, the system, of course,is dangerous, unsatisfactory, and has no resistance to the inevitable forces.''He further testified that ``Two-tier shores have to be braced totally,not only where they come in and rest upon one another, but also in bothdirections, in both tiers, they will have to be braced to make sure thatany lateral forces that we can expect will not overturn.''SSFI (Ex. 21) also testified at the hearing to reaffirm their positionas it appeared in their earlier written comment (Ex. 14-44) opposing theuse of single-post shores for multi-tiered construction (Tr. I, 177).On the other hand, a representative from Dun-Par (Tr. II, 10) agreed withthe proposed rule but acknowledged that ``Double tier shoring can be verydangerous.'' But, he also said, ``It is a good alternative if it is properlydesigned and constructed.'' The Dun-Par representative pointed to the fallhazards associated with erecting a 60 foot scaffold to explain his positionthat prohibiting tiered single-post shores could pose a greater hazardto workers erecting other shoring systems.After considering all of the comments and testimony received on this provision,OSHA has decided to allow the use of single post shores in more than onetier provided the employer has a qualified designer prepare the shoringdesign, and that after the shoring is erected, the employer have an engineerwho is qualified in structural design, inspect the shoring. In addition,several criteria for bracing the shoring, as discussed above, have alsobeen made a part of the single post shoring requirements. Additionally,the general requirement in andSection; 1926.703(a)(1) that all formwork (whichincludes shores) be ``* * * capable of supporting without failure * * *''must be met when tiering single post shores. Because of a lack of informationand evidence submitted to the record, OSHA has rejected the recommendationsof those who sought to have tiered single post shoring prohibited. Althoughmany commenters recommended that OSHA prohibit that type of shoring, theoverwhelmingly stated reason was that tiered single post shores neededspecial attention; that bracing was critical; and that only qualified designersand engineers could design and erect a system so that it would be safe.OSHA believes all of these concerns have been addressed in the final rule.In addition, OSHA observes that Ceco and Dun-Par (both formwork contractors)as well as both its expert witnesses testified that it is possible to designa safe system. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(8) as revised.Paragraph (b)(9) of the final rule prohibits the adjustment of single postshores to raise formwork after the placement of concrete. This is identicalto the existing requirement in andSection; 1926.701(d)(5), which OSHA proposedto delete. OSHA explained in the proposal that it felt this rule was notneeded for employee protection because it did not believe there was a dangerof concrete collapse due to adjustment of single post shores and that therule was intended to protect property. However, several commenters disagreedwith the proposed deletion of this rule. Conshor Incorporated (Ex. 14-11)commented as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">With reference to the proposed elimination of existing Paragraph 701(d)(s)[sic] which prohibits the adjustment of single post shores after placementof concrete, this paragraph should not be eliminated. Adjustment couldcause overloading of shore. It is possible that stability or structurallacing would have to be moved in order to adjust shores, creating a verydangerous situation after concrete has been placed.</ITAG>The WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) commented that andSection; 1926.701(d)(5) in the currentstandard should be retained. Patent (Ex. 14-41) noted in their commentthat there were serious deficiencies in the provision regarding adjustmentof forming system after pouring the concrete. Patent referred OSHA to theSSFI comment for details.The SSFI (Ex. 14-44) commented, ``The Institute recommends that a requirementsimilar to .701(d)(5) of the existing rules should remain in the proposedrules and expanded to cover all shoring.'' The SSFI explained their belief,``that employee protection can be affected if adjustments either increaseor decrease intended loads on that element and/or adjacent members so asto put those elements in danger of immediate or subsequent progressivefailure of the formwork.''In addition, the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard (section 6.7.5) also recognizesthe potential hazard of adjusting single post shores after the initialset of the concrete. After careful consideration of the comment received,OSHA agrees that the adjustment of shores will likely involve the movingof key bracing elements which are critical for formwork stability. Theresulting lack of bracing could lead to formwork collapse and, therefore,pose a danger to employees. Consequently, OSHA has determined that it isnecessary to regulate this hazard which could cause formwork collapse.Therefore, OSHA redesignates existing andSection; 1926.701(a)(5) as paragraph(b)(9). Paragraph (b)(10) of the final rule requires the employer to erect reshoringwhenever the concrete is required to support loads in excess of its capacity.It also specifies that the reshoring operation is to be carried out asthe forms and shores are removed. This provision was relocated from andSection; 1926.705(e)(1) of the proposedrule which was based on the existing provision in andSection; 1926.700(e)(1)(v).The existing provision requires that reshoring be provided when necessaryto safely support slabs and beams after stripping, or where such membersare subjected to imposed loads due to construction work done. OSHA proposedto revise the existing rule to require reshoring to be erected after theremoval of forms to transfer loads to other members whenever the concreteis required to support loads in excess of its capacity. OSHA received two substantive comments on the proposed rule both of whichindicated concern with the sequence (timeframe) in which reshoring operationswere conducted. The WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) commented that reshoring operationswere conducted. The WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) commented that reshoring shouldbe placed <T3>immediately after </T3>form removal because ``the placement of reshoresis critical and in direct relationship to the time factors involved inform removal.'' They also suggested that time intervals between strippingand reshoring be in the written program and in no case shall unsupportedconcrete be left after the end of the working day. OSHA observes that itdid not propose a written program and thus has not responded to this portionof the comment. On the other hand, the BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented that reshores shouldbe placed <T3>during </T3>the removal of forms. They felt that the proposed languagewould allow the employer to remove the entire formwork system before anyreshoring takes place. They also recommended that the reshoring system,like the initial formwork, should be included in the engineer's designspecification and erected under the engineer's supervision. After careful consideration of the comments received, OSHA has determinedthat the final rule should indicate clearly that reshoring operations areconducted <T3>as </T3>the original forms and shores are removed rather than <T3>after </T3>all the forms and shores have been removed. Therefore, OSHApromulgates paragraph (b)(10) as revised. Paragraph (c) of the final rule contains the specific requirements forvertical slip forms. Paragraph (c)(1) requires that the steel rods or pipeon which jacks climb or by which the forms are lifted be specifically designedfor that purpose and adequately braced where they are not encased in concrete.The final rule is identical to andSection; 1926.705(b)(1) of the proposedrule and andSection; 1926.701(b)(1) in the existing rule. OSHA observes thatsimilar provisions are contained in Section 6.5.2 of the ANSI A10.90-1970standard and section 7.5.2 of the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard. OSHA received one comment on this provision and that was from the BCTD.The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented, that in keeping with the concerns theyexpressed in their comment on the general formwork provision that OSHAshould specify that the slip form systems should be designed by the structuralengineer. OSHA notes that it has already responded to the BCTD concernsin its discussion of andSection; 1926.703(a)(1), above, and the reasons thatOSHA put forth in rejecting the BCTD's suggestion for formwork in generalare the same reasons why OSHA has not incorporated their suggestion asit pertains to vertical slip forms in particular. After careful considerationof the singular comment received, OSHA has determined that no revisionto the proposed requirement is necessary. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph(c)(1) as proposed.   Paragraph (c)(2) requires that forms be designed to prevent excessive distortionof the structure during the jacking operation. The final rule is essentiallythe same as the requirement proposed in andSection; 1926.705(b)(5) and theexisting rule in andSection; 1926.701(b)(5), except that it has been rewrittenin performance language. Specifically, instead of specifying that the formshave to be laterally and diagonally braced to prevent excessive distortion,the final rule allows the employer the flexibility to decide how best toprevent excessive distortion. This change from specification language toperformance language is accomplished by removing the words ``lateral anddiagonal bracing'' from the proposed rule and stating the performance tobe achieved_that the forms be designed to prevent excessive distortionof the structure. This revision was prompted by a suggestion by the NCCSHACin their comment (Ex. 14-16).The NCCSHAC pointed out that slip forms for tapered columns cannot be rigidlybraced because the forming system must decrease in diameter during theplacement of concrete. NCCSHAC suggested that the proposed rule be rewrittenin more performance type language.OSHA agrees with NCCSHAC that the proposed language is too specific and,therefore, has revised the provision using language to express the performanceto be achieved. OSHA believes the revised language will provide employeesthe same degree of protection as the proposed requirement while allowingemployers flexibility to design the forms in a manner that will preventexcessive distortion of the structure. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph(c)(2) as revised.Paragraph (c)(3) of the final rule requires that all vertical slip formsbe provided with scaffolds or work platforms where employees are requiredto work or pass. This paragraph was relocated from andSection; 1926.705(b)(7)of the proposal. The proposed rule was based on an existing rule in andSection;1926.701(b)(7) which requires that all vertical lift forms be providedwith scaffolding or work platforms that completely encircle the area ofconcrete placement. OSHA observes that an essentially similar provisionis contained in Section 7.5.9 of the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard.OSHA proposed two revisions to the existing standard. First, OSHA proposedto replace the word ``lift'' with ``slip'' for clarity. Second, OSHA proposedto replace the phrase ``completely encircling the area of placement'' withthe phrase ``where employees are required to work or pass.'' The latterrevision was proposed because OSHA had determined that scaffolds and workplatforms were needed only in areas where employees would be present, eitherworking or passing through. Since the existing rule required the erectionof scaffolds or work platforms completely encircling the area of placement,regardless of whether or not employees were using them, OSHA felt it appropriateto revise the provision to address solely, the issue of employee safety.OSHA observes that a recommendation to effect this change was made by apublic participant representing the NCCSHAC at the ACCSH meeting held onNovember 30, 1982, at which a draft concrete and masonry standard was discussed(Tr. 218). The transcript of the ACCSH meeting did not reveal any objectionto the recommendation.OSHA received no comment on the proposed substitution of the word ``slip''for ``lift.'' However, OSHA received three comments on the proposed revisionregarding where scaffolds or work platforms should be required. The SSFI(Ex. 21) supported the proposed rule to provide scaffolds or work platformswhere employees are required to work or pass. However, they commented thatthey were concerned that the proposed rule would prohibit the erectionof scaffolds on slip forms where the scaffolds are needed for stability.The WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) stated that scaffolds or work platforms that completelyencircle the area of placement were required for strength, in additionto being necessary for concrete placement and finishing. The BCTD (Ex.14-40) commented, ``As for OSHA's elimination of the current requirementthat scaffolding be placed on both sides of the forms, the agency shouldconsider whether this revision will throw the formwork system out of balance,thereby creating hazards to the employees' safety.''Because the WMACSA and BCTD raised an issue of reduced employee safetyif scaffolds or work platforms were not erected to completely encirclethe area of placement, OSHA decided to seek additional information in thehearing notice. In that notice, OSHA stated the concerns of the commentersregarding stability and asked for additional information. OSHA sought todetermine whether full perimeter access was needed for stability as wellas for the use by employees placing and finishing concrete. OSHA receivedonly one comment on this issue. That comment was made by John Hanson, OSHA'sexpert witness (Ex. 18), who expressed his belief that nearly full perimeteraccess would be required for proper placement of concrete. Mr. Hanson alsocommented that he felt elimination of unnecessary scaffolds would not throwthe formwork out of balance since the unbalanced condition would be consideredin the design of the scaffold.After careful consideration of the comments received, OSHA has determinedthat no further revision of the proposed provision is necessary. Sinceslip form stability is adequately addressed in andSection; 1926.703(a)(1)in the final rule, it need not be addressed again in this provision. OSHAnotes that andSection; 1926.703(a)(1) requires all formwork (which includesslip forms) to be designated, fabricated, erected, supported, braced, andmaintained to support, without failure, all vertical and lateral loadsthat may reasonably be anticipated to be applied to the formwork. Additionally,OSHA does not agree with the concern of SSFI that the provision would prohibiterecting scaffolds in areas other than where they were specifically required.If employers wish to erect additional scaffolds or work platforms to providestability, this requirement is not intended to prohibit it. This provisionspecifies the particular areas, where, at a minimum, scaffolds or workplatforms must be erected. As with any OSHA requirement, employers arealways free to go ``beyond'' the minimal requirements imposed by OSHA.Therefore, the final rule, like the proposal, requires that scaffolds orwork platforms must be erected where employees are required to work orpass. If the scaffolds or work platforms are part of the slip form design,the final rule does not prohibit their erection in any area where the employerdeems them necessary. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (c)(3) as proposed.Paragraph (c)(4) of the final rule requires that jacks and vertical supportsbe positioned in such manner that the loads do not exceed the rated capacityof the jacks. This paragraph was relocated from andSection; 1926.705(b)(2)of the proposal which contained a similar provision requiring that jacksand vertical supports be positioned in such a manner that ``vertical loadsare distributed equally.'' It is also identical to a provision in Section7.5.3 of the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard. OSHA received two comments on this provision. The PCA (Ex. 14-9) recommendedthat OSHA change the word ``equally'' to ``uniformly.'' The NCCSHAC (Ex.14-16) pointed out that vertical loads could not be equally distributedon the jacks because during the lifting process some of the jacks retractwhile others are lifting. They, therefore, recommended that the wordingof the proposed rule be revised to reflect their concern. OSHA agrees withthe NCCSHAC in that it recognizes that it is almost impossible to distributethe vertical loads equally on the jacks and vertical supports. For example,the weight of concrete as it is placed and the moving weight of employeesplaces unsymmetrical loads on the slip form. The jacks would have to berepositioned every time these loads are moved in order to equally distributethese vertical loads. Therefore, OSHA has revised the provision to deletethe specific requirement for equal distribution of the vertical loads.OSHA believes the revised rule will provide protection to employees equivalentto that of the proposal since the revised rule prohibits employers fromexceeding the rated capacity of the jacks. Therefore, OSHA promulgatesparagraph (c)(4) as revised. Paragraph (c)(5) of the final rule requires that jacks or other liftingdevices be provided with mechanical dogs or other automatic holding devicesto support slip forms whenever failure of the power supply or the liftingmechanism occurs. This provision is identical to andSection; 1926.705(b)(3)of the proposed rule. OSHA observes that Section 7.5.4 of the ANSI A10.9-1983standard contains an essentially similar provision. The proposed rule wasbased on an existing rule in andSection; 1926.701(b)(3) which requires jacksor other lifting devices to be provided with mechanical dogs or other automaticholding devices to provide protection in case of failure of the power supplyor the lifting mechanism. OSHA proposed to replace the phrase ``providedprotection in case of'' with ``support the slip forms whenever failureof the power supply or lifting mechanism occurs.'' This revision was aneditorial change made for the purpose of clarity. OSHA did not receiveany comments on the proposed provision and, based on the earlier rationale,promulgates paragraph (c)(5) as proposed. Paragraph (c)(6) of the final rule requires that the form structure bemaintained within the design tolerances for plumbness during the jackingoperation. This paragraph was relocated from andSection; 1926.705(b)(6) ofthe proposal which required the form structure to be maintained in lineand plumb during the jacking operation. OSHA observes that Section 7.5.7of the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard contains an essentially similar provision.The final rule is the same as the proposed rule except the phrase ``inline and plumb'' has been revised to read ``within all specified designtolerances.'' OSHA received two comments on the proposed provision. The NCA (Ex. 14-29) commented, ``If the primary concern is quality controlrather than safety, [this] requirement should be deleted.'' The NCCSHAC(Ex. 14-16) commented that since ``in line'' and ``plumb'' must necessarilyhave working tolerances, OSHA should rephrase the provision to read asfollows: ``The form structure shall be maintained within the design tolerancesfor plumbness during the jacking operation.'' OSHA agrees with the NCCSHAC and recognizes that construction practicespermit formwork lines, grades, and dimensions to vary from those in thedesign. In fact, a list of such recommended tolerances for vertically slipformed structures can be found in <T3>The Recommended Practice for Concrete Formwork</T3> (Ex. 12). In viewof the foregoing, OSHA decided to revise the proposed rule to require thatslip form structures be maintained within all design tolerance specifiedfor plumbness during jacking operation. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph(c)(6) as revised.  Paragraph (c)(7) of the final rule requires that the predetermined saferate of lift not be exceeded. This paragraph was relocated from andSection;1926.705(b)(4) of the proposal which required that lifting proceed steadilyand uniformly and not in excess of the predetermined safe rate of lift.The final rule is the same as the proposed rule except the phrase ``proceedsteadily and uniformly'' was deleted. OSHA observes that Section 7.5.5of the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard contains an essentially similar provision. OSHA received two comments on the proposed provision. The NCCSHAC (Ex.14-16) pointed out that jacking operations in slip form construction arenot ``continuous'' in the true sense of the word in that the operationproceeds in distinct, discrete steps with the jacks individually extendingand retracting within their working length. In view of this, the commenterrecommended that the proposed rule be revised to read as follows: ``Liftingshall not exceed the predetermined rate of lift.'' OSHA recognizes that,in fact, slip forms do not move continuously during concrete placement;therefore, the words ``proceed steadily and uniformly'' were deleted. Another commenter, the BCTD (Ex. 14-40), wanted an additional requirementfor determining the rate of lift. They stated, ``The standard itself shouldmake clear that the employer must make decisions regarding the rate oflift in consultation with, and on the approval of the engineer.'' However,the BCTD did not explain why it felt that it would be appropriate for employersto consult with and obtain the approval of engineers. There being an absenceof support or explanation for the recommended change, OSHA has decidednot to take any action with regard to the BCTD's suggestion. Therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraph (c)(7) as revised.  Paragraph (d) contains two requirements relating to reinforcing steel.Paragraph (d)(1) requires that reinforcing steel for walls, piers, columns,and similar vertical structures be adequately supported to prevent overturningand to prevent collapse. OSHA observes that Section 3.3 of the ANSI A10.9-1983standard contains a similar provision. This paragraph combines and relocatesandSection;andSection; 1926.702(c)(1) and 1926.702(c)(2) of the proposed rule.The proposed rule was based on an existing provision in andSection; 1926.700(b)(3)that requires reinforcing steel for walls, piers, columns, and similarvertical structures to be guyed and supported to prevent collapse. OSHAproposed to revise the existing requirement by replacing the words ``guyand'' with the word ``laterally'' in order to allow employers the flexibilityto support the reinforcing steel by any method of lateral support. OSHAalso proposed to add the phrase ``to resist overturning forces'' to statethe purpose of the lateral support. Finally, OSHA proposed, as a separaterequirement in andSection; 1926.702(c)(2), a provision that the lateral supportsbe capable of withstanding the forces that would be applied during construction.OSHA received several comments on the proposed requirements.  The BCTD (Ex. 14-40), recommended that two changes be made to the proposal.First, they noted that OSHA, in the preamble to the proposed rule, hadexplained that the purpose of lateral supports was to protect against overturningforces and construction forces. The BCTD recommended that this explanationbe made a part of the actual requirement. They further suggested how OSHAcould rewrite the provision to incorporate the purpose of the requirement.Specifically, they suggested the provision read identical to the proposalwith the following language added: ``(<T3>such as the wind) and to prevent collapse.'' </T3>OSHA agrees thatthe purpose of the supports, which provides the performance to be achievedby the employer, should be clear in the final rule and, therefore, hasrevised the final requirement accordingly. Second, the BCTD recommendedthat lateral support be defined to mean ``any properly anchored means ofsteadying a piece or structure by pulling against or resisting an off-centerload.''.  The WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) stated that the wording in proposed andSection; 1926.702(c)(1)should be changed to permit guying in addition to lateral support.  Another commenter, Ceco (Ex. 14-45), suggested that OSHA omit the word``lateral'' which implied ``coming from the side.'' Ceco pointed out thatreinforcing steel can be supported from other directions and cited exampleswhere lateral support coming from the side was impractical. This divergenceof comment prompted OSHA to seek additional information through the publichearing notice.  In the hearing notice OSHA explained the various viewpoints of commentersand asked for additional information to enable OSHA to determine whetheror not the proposed requirement should be revised to permit other methodsof support (other than lateral support) to prevent the collapse of erectedreinforcing steel. OSHA received three comments on this issue.  Ceco (Ex. 14-47) again commented that ``lateral'' support should not bespecified and offered two examples of how to provide support in other thana ``lateral'' direction.Ingvar Schousboe, OSHA's expert witness (Ex. 19), commented that ``Anykind of bracing that can deliver the lateral force to resist overturningof reinforcing steel cages erected for vertical building elements can beemployed.'' He also stated, ``The bracing may be horizontal or inclinedas long as the horizontal component of the axial force in the bracing isadequate.''In addition, John Hanson, another OSHA expert witness (Tr. I, 88), testifiedthat guying often is not used because it interferes with the constructionprocess. Instead, he felt that it is more common to use either supplementalpieces of reinforcing steel to crossbrace the erected steel, or to erectone side (or some portion) of the formwork and then brace the steel againstit.After careful consideration of the comments and testimony received, OSHAhas decided to revise the proposed rule to allow any method of supportso long as it is adequate to resist overturning forces and to prevent collapse.OSHA believes the revised language provides a level of safety equivalentto that of the proposed language, while at the same time providing employerflexibility to select a method of support that will not interfere withother construction operations. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (d)(1)as revised.Paragraph (d)(2) of the final rule requires the employer to take measuresto prevent unrolled wire mesh from recoiling. Such measures include securingthe ends or turning over the mesh. This paragraph was relocated from andSection;1926.702(d) of the proposal. The proposed rule was essentially the sameas the existing rule in andSection; 1926.700(b)(4), except the existing rulecontains the word ``dangerous'' to describe the effect of the recoilingaction. OSHA proposed to revise the existing rule by deleting, as unnecessary,the word ``dangerous.'' OSHA observes that Section 3.4 of the ANSI A10.9-1983standard also addresses the hazards associated with the recoiling of wiremesh.OSHA received only one comment on the proposed rule. The MCISC (14-19)pointed out that a common practice in the industry is to unroll wire meshand then flip it over before installation. They also stated that this procedureeffectively prevents recoiling action and it should be considered equallysafe as securing each end of wire mesh rolls.OSHA agrees that methods other than ``securing each end'' are effectivein preventing the mesh from recoiling, and therefore, has revised the provisionto state the performance to be achieved and to allow employers to takewhatever measures they feel are necessary to prevent recoiling action.OSHA feels the revised requirement provides a level of safety equal tothat of the proposed rule and, therefore, promulgates paragraph (d)(2)as revised.Paragraph (e) of the final rule sets forth requirements for the removalof formwork. Paragraph (e)(1) addresses the removal of the original formsand shores and paragraph (e)(2) addresses the removal of reshoring. Theintent of these requirements is to prevent accidents such as the one thatoccurred on March 2, 1973, where 14 employees were killed and 34 employeeswere injured. In that accident, employees were removing the concrete formssupporting the 23rd floor of an apartment building under construction.The 23rd floor collapsed which caused the progressive failure of otherfloors of the apartment building. The fatalities and injuries resultedfrom the collapse of these floors. The National Bureau of Standards ina report for OSHA, concluded that premature removal of forms was a contributingfactor to the building collapse (Ex. 3, p. 85). Observance of the existingprovisions in the ANSI A10.9-1970 standard could have prevented this accident.Observance of the final rule requirements in this paragraph, which eliminatethe reference to ANSI and instead clearly set forth the requirements forformwork removal, will prevent similar accidents of this nature. Paragraph (e)(1) prohibits the removal of forms and shores until the employerdetermines that the concrete has gained sufficient strength to supportits weight and superimposed loads. To make this determination, compliancewith one of the following alternatives is required. The first alternativeis that the plans and specifications stipulate conditions for removal offorms and shores, and that such conditions have been followed. The secondalternative is that the employer has tested the concrete with an appropriateASTM standard test method designed to indicate concrete compressive strength,and the test results indicate that the concrete has gained sufficient strengthto support its weight and superimposed loads. The proposed rule also sets forth two alternatives from which the employercould choose to determine the appropriate time for removal of forms andshores. As explained above, one of the alternatives in the final rule isessentially the same as one of the proposed alternatives, and the otheris different. Further, both alternatives in the final rule differ fromthe existing rule (which OSHA incorporated by referencing the ANSI A10.9-1970standard). The existing rule (the ANSI standard) prohibits the premature removal offorms and requires that engineer's specifications and local building codesshall be adhered to in determining the length of time forms should remainin place following concrete placement. <T3>In addition, </T3>the existing rule requires that tests shall be madeon field-cured concrete specimens [this typically meant that several cylinderswould be filled with concrete from the same mix that was being placed atthe jobsite, left to cure, and then later, the cylinders would be testedin a laboratory to determine the compressive strength of the concrete]in order to insure that the concrete has obtained sufficient strength tosafely support the load prior to the removal of forms. The existing rulealso provides a table that can be followed in those situations where engineer'sspecifications or local building codes are not used to control form removaltime. This table is identified by OSHA in the proposed rule and discussedin the final rule as Table Q-1. OSHA proposed in andSection; 1926.705(d) to revise the existing rule allowingemployers to choose between following the times listed in Table Q-1 <T3>or </T3>performing a test, using any ASTM test method that was designedto indicate the concrete compressive strength before removing forms andshores. If the test were chosen, the results would have to indicate thatthe concrete had gained sufficient strength to support its weight and superimposedloads. OSHA also proposed to revise the existing rule by changing the phrase``field-cured'' to ``appropriate ASTM standard,'' thereby allowing theemployer to use any one of several test methods currently available todemonstrate compressive strength. This change recognizes technologicalchanges made in testing for concrete strength and provides worker protectionequivalent to the existing standard which recognizes only one method oftesting the concrete (see discussion above on the cylinder test method).In addition to requesting comment on the proposed language, OSHA also raisedfour issues in the NPRM specific to concrete testing. Each issue is discussedbelow. Because the comments received on the proposed provision are alldirectly related to one of the four issues raised in the NPRM, the commentswill be set forth following each issue. In Issue andplusmin;1 OSHA asked for specific comment on whether or not itshould require written procedures for testing concrete. OSHA explainedthat the Advisory Committee on Construction Safety and Health (ACCSH) (Ex.1)recommended that employers prepare written test procedures for testingconcrete and make the test results available to the Secretary of Labor.Through this issue OSHA sought to determine the problems and benefits ofa requirement for written test procedures. Several comments were receivedon this issue addressing written procedures. Four commenters (Exs. 14-29,14-33, 14-36, and 14-40) stated that written test procedures would servea useful purpose and would be beneficial. For example, Fred Berglund andSons, Inc. (FBS) (Ex. 14-33) commented, ``* * * test results for concretewould serve to show documentation for strength and material content * **.'' The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented as follows.<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * we believe that testing should be required before the formworkis removed; that the type of test may be prescribed by the engineer, butshould provide accurate information about the condition of the concrete;that the procedures and results should be written and available * * *.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">* * * making the test results available will act as a sort of check,to guarantee that the tests are properly and timely performed, and willlet the employees know that they are working on a safe job * * *.</ITAG>However, many commenters (Exs. 14-8, 14-10, 14-20, 14-21, 14-27, 14-31,14-35, 14-36, and 14-45) stated that written test procedures would serveno useful purpose, nor produce any benefit. For example, Scott Bridge Company(Ex. 14-21) commented, ``If [concrete] tests are required, there are enoughstandardized procedures available that would make preparation of separateprocedures by an employer an exercise in duplication.'' Bechtel (Ex. 14-35)also commented, ``* * * few compliance officers are qualified or capableof reviewing plans and test data to determine their adequacy * * *.'' Finally,the NCCSHAC (Ex. 14-16) commented as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Each employer should be responsible for establishing form removalcriteria specific to their equipment and requirements. Making such informationavailable to others could entail publishing what may be considered proprietaryinformation regarding procedures and equipment. Conscientious employerswho devote (or have devoted) time and financial resources toward establishingsafe equipment and construction procedures should not be penalized by havingto make this information available to less conscientious competitors.</ITAG>It is apparent to OSHA, after reviewing the comments received on this issue,that it did not properly phrase Issue andplusmin;1, since its intent waswidely misunderstood. Specifically, the question was not, ``Should employershave to develop a test method (procedures)?'' as some commenters apparentlythought. OSHA notes that it had already specified that an ASTM test methodwould have to be used. Rather, the question was, ``Should the employerhave a plan (procedure) for testing the concrete and should the resultsof the test(s) be kept at the jobsite for review? In asking this question,some assumptions were made; i.e., that tests would actually be performedand that ASTM test methods would be used. What OSHA sought to determinewas <T3>whether or not OSHA should require the employer to have a defined procedureto follow.</T3> Such a procedure might give the following information:what ASTM test method was to be employed, when to conduct the test, andby whom the test would be performed. For example, a procedure might statethat 4 days after floor number 1 was placed the concrete would be testedusing ASTM Test Method ``X'' by XYZ Test Company to determine the strengthreached. Such a procedure could, of course, be much more detailed. Withthis information established in written form, along with the results ofthe test, the employer should be able to determine whether the formworkcould safely be removed.After careful consideration of the comments received in response to Issueandplusmin;1, OSHA has decided that no additional requirements will be addedto this section. Because the majority of the commenters misunderstood thequestion being asked by OSHA, the information and evidence that was forthcomingwas not useful to OSHA in determining whether or not employee safety wouldbe enhanced if employers were required to document their testing proceduresand if employers were required to document their test results. However,OSHA notes that its failure to require employers to document their testprocedure or to document the results of their test does not, in any way,alter the requirements set forth in andSection; 1926.703(e). Section 1926.703(e)requires that the forms and shores remain in place until the employer determinesthat the concrete has gained sufficient strength to support its weightand superimposed loads. The employer is given two alternatives, one ofwhich the employer must perform, to make such a determination. One alternativeis to follow the plans and specifications (performing whatever tests arespecified) and the other is to test the concrete using an appropriate ASTMtest.In Issue andplusmin;2, OSHA requested specific comment on inplace testingmethods_those methods in which the concrete is tested while it is stillin the forms. OSHA indicated when raising this issue that it had receivedcomments from interested individuals who recommended that only in-placetesting of concrete should be permitted to evaluate the strength of concrete.OSHA sought to determine whether there were any reasons related to employeesafety that it should restrict concrete testing to in-place testing methodsrather than allowing employers to conduct a compressive strength test oncylinders which is the typical practice. In response to Issue andplusmin;2,the AGC (Ex. 14-31) commented as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * in-place method of concrete testing is not practical. In-placetesting methods are not readily available to contractors, particularlysmall contractors. Cylinder testing when properly performed and in conformancewith engineering specifications and building codes provides the necessarysafeguards. Additional testing and training requirements would be redundantand require extra costs.</ITAG>The State of California (Ex. 14-2) stated that both cylinder and in-placetesting should be permitted because in-place testing may not be feasiblein some cases such as underwater construction. Two other commenters supportedin-place testing procedures. Miller and Long Concrete Construction, Inc.(MLCC) (Ex. 14-42) commented that in-place testing is the most accurateform of concrete testing because the test is performed on the concretein the forms. The other commenter, BCTD (Ex. 14-40), commented as follows.<ITAG tagnum="21">It is our view that in-place testing can most adequately determinewhether the particular pour of concrete, in the particular location, underthe particular circumstances, has reached the proper structural strengthto permit the removal of the forms. However, other kinds of tests, prescribedby the engineer, which provide the same information, may also be adequate.</ITAG>In consideration of the comments received in response to Issue andplusmin;2,OSHA has determined that both in-place and cylinder tests are equally effectiveand both should be allowed as acceptable methods of testing concrete. Thisdetermination has been reflected in the final rule which allows the employerto perform any appropriate ASTM test method designed to indicate the compressivestrength of the concrete as one way of determining when to remove formwork.In Issue andplusmin;3, OSHA requested specific comment on the current industrypractice for determining when forms may be removed. OSHA explained thatthe existing standard requires the concrete forms to be left in place forthe length of time indicated by the engineering specifications, local buildingcodes, or as specified in Table 2 of ANSI A10.9-1970 (Ex. 9) (identifiedas Table Q-1 in the NPRM) and then the concrete is to be tested. Throughthis issue OSHA sought to determine the current industry practice for determiningwhen to remove forms.In Issue andplusmin;4, OSHA requested comment on whether or not it shouldrequire the employer to leave the forms in place for the time specifiedin Table Q-1 and also require the employer to test the concrete for strengthbefore form removal. OSHA explained that the NPRM allowed the employerto choose either one of these methods to determine form removal time.Several comments were received on these issues. Two comments indicatedthat the engineer or architect establishes the criteria for determiningwhen the forms may be removed. For example, the AGC (Ex. 14-31) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">Industry practice with regard to concrete form removal has been toconform with engineering specifications. There are many factors which affectconcrete strength, and thus concrete form removal. A minimum strength isgenerally set out in engineering specifications and that strength is determinedthrough cylinder tests and/or required or specified periods of time.</ITAG>Scott Bridge Company (Ex. 14-21) also stated that the current practicefor highway bridge form removal is usually set forth in the specificationsof highway or transportation departments.Three commenters (Exs. 14-2, 14-27, and 14-33) stated that both the timetable and concrete testing should be required to provide assurance thatthe concrete has attained sufficient strength to support loads safely;for example, FBS (Ex. 14-33) stated that allowing for both methods willreduce any error that may surface due to extraneous elements affectingone method and not the other.Other commenters (Exs. 14-20, 14-21, 14-28, 14-31, 14-36, 14-37, and 14-45)stated that requiring the use of Table Q-1 and concrete testing beforeform removal would be redundant and delay project completion. For example,the AGC (Ex. 14-31) commented as follows.<ITAG tagnum="21">With regard to provisions within the standard to require both testingand time, AGC believes that this requirement would be unnecessarily restrictive.Concrete pours are made in accordance with specifications and in most casesentail testing. Requiring both methods (time and testing) would cause unduecost and possibly impact schedules.</ITAG>John Hanson, OSHA's expert witness (Tr. I, 92) testified:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * minimum times given in Table Q-1 should not apply if the engineer,or in other words, the responsible person, has established longer timesin the project documents. For that matter, in my opinion, they should nothave to apply if the responsible engineer or architect has establisheda shorter time.</ITAG>Dun-Par (Ex. 14-10) commented, ``* * * the engineer of record should havethe authority to deviate from those requirements [Table Q-1]. He [the engineer]is the one who designed the structure. He knows more about that buildingthan anybody else.'' Finally, the AGC (Ex. 14-31) commented that industrypractice with regard to concrete form removal has been to conform withengineering specifications.After careful consideration of the comments and testimony received in bothIssues andplusmin;3 and andplusmin;4, OSHA has determined that the engineeringspecifications or formwork plans often stipulate the conditions to be followed,including whatever tests are necessary, prior to the removal of formwork.This determination has caused OSHA to revise the proposed requirement forremoval of forms and shores. In particular, OSHA has revised the provisionto require that forms and shores (except for slabs on grade and slip forms)remain in place until the employer has determined that the concrete hasreached sufficient strength to support its weight and superimposed loads.The employer must make this determination after having complied with oneof two alternatives. As a result of the evidence and information receivedin response to Issues andplusmin;3 and andplusmin;4, the final rule has beenrevised to indicate that one of these alternatives is that the plans orspecifications actually stipulate conditions for formwork removal, andthe employer has followed those conditions.An alternative proposed in paragraph (d)(1) of the NPRM, but deleted inthe final rule would have allowed the employer to determine when to removeformwork by simply following the times listed in Table Q-1 of the NPRM.OSHA received several comments and several organizations testified at thehearing on the acceptability of Table Q-1 in lieu of an actual test.The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) objected to the reliance on Table Q-1 to determinethe time before removing formwork. They based their objection on, amongother things, the belief that employers would ignore the formwork removalvariables. They felt that concrete should be tested for proper strength.Dun-Par (Tr. II, 6) testified, ``This Table Q-1 * * * is an antique.''Ingvar Schousboe (Ex. 19) commented that concrete elements such as walls,columns, piers, and pile caps may be stripped of forms on the basis ofelapsed time and temperature because the risk is low or nonexistent. However,he did not recommend the use of time for removal of forms from under floors.Mr. Schousboe based his recommendation on the need to know, by testing,the quality of the concrete that was delivered to the site.The UBCJA (Tr. II, 40) testified as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Of critical importance is the timing of form and shoring removal.OSHA has proposed a timetable Q-1 to be used for form removal. We wantto reiterate our objections to the sole reliance on this time, since itdoes not take into account all of the many variables that can affect concretestrength and curing time.</ITAG>They again stated their objection to the use of Table Q-1 in post hearingcomments (Ex. 30).The PCA (Ex. 14-5) recommended that the note regarding the minimum curingtemperature precede Table Q-1 to provide greater emphasis on the effectof temperature on concrete curing. They also recommended that OSHA prohibitthe use of Table Q-1 to remove forms and shores from under concrete containingfly ash or ground granulated iron blast furnace slag. They based theirobjection on the fact that concrete containing these materials has differentstrength gain characteristics than standard portland cement concrete. However,the commenter did not provide any information comparing the strength gaincharacteristics of fly ash concrete with standard portland concrete. OSHArequested comment in the hearing notice on the use of Table Q-1 for removingforms and shores from concrete containing fly ash or ground iron blastfurnace slag. In the notice, OSHA stated that one commenter had recommendedthat such concrete should be tested before removal of forms. OSHA soughtto determine whether the use of Table Q-1 should be prohibited for concretecontaining these materials.One person and one company testified at the hearing on this issue. Thetestimony disagreed with the comment made by the PCA.John Hanson (Tr. I, 91) testified as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">It is well recognized that the strength-gain characteristics of pozzolanconcretes are less at early ages when compared to portland cement withoutpozzolans. However, Table Q-1, in my view, should be considered to representthe judgment of qualified people in the profession as to circumstanceswhen, if the concrete has [not] been tested, the forms may be removed.</ITAG>A representative from Blue Circle Holdings Inc. (Blue Circle) (Tr. I, 205)testified:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * Table Q-1 has been used quite successfully over many, many yearsand has done so at times where the finest and the activity of portlandcements was much slower than we have in today's modern cements. This systemworked very well for those years, and all of the changes in the constructionprocedures and the rate of strength gains for conventional portland cementsand concrete have increased to the point that we still feel the Table Q-1is quite relative and does provide an assurance of safety for the worker.</ITAG>OSHA also requested comment in the hearing notice on the effect of loweringthe temperature used in Table Q-1, explaining that Scott Bridge Company(Ex. 14-21) recommended that the temperature used in Table Q-1 be loweredto 40anddegrees;F because the lower temperature is used in highway specificationsfor form removal.One comment was received and two persons testified at the hearing on thisissue. The comment and testimony did not support lowering the temperaturein Table Q-1 from 50anddegrees;F to 40anddegrees;F. John Hanson (Ex. 18) commentedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * it would be my view that it is important to stay very closeto the ACI [American Concrete Institute] standard from which this tablewas taken on this matter, since the times represent a judgment of responsibleprofessionals and their judgment was that this temperature should be 50degrees fahrenheit.</ITAG>Ingvar Schousboe (Tr. I, 141) testified, ``The selected cutoff point forambient temperature, 50anddegrees;F or 40anddegrees;F, if applied to the sametime table can hardly be expected to give equally safe results.''Finally, Blue Circle's representative (Tr. I, 206) said the following:<ITAG tagnum="21">With regard to reducing the temperature to below 50 degrees as notedin Table Q-1 to 40 degrees, we do not feel that this would be a prudentchange in those structures that may be elevated and possibly present aproblem when forms are removed. The hydration of portland cement is sloweddown significantly at 40 degrees. In fact, some may state that the hydrationhardly exists at 40-degree temperature * * *.</ITAG>However, after careful consideration of the comments and testimony on theuse of Table Q-1, OSHA has determined that although following Table Q-1is sometimes acceptable for determining when to remove certain formwork,sole reliance on the table is not sufficient for determining if the concretehas indeed reached the strength needed to support its weight and all superimposedloads. Thus, if an employer relied exclusively on Table Q-1 to determinewhen to remove formwork, an appropriate level of safety may not be affordedto workers. OSHA does recognize that there are situations where simplywaiting for time to pass may be acceptable, but such situations must bedetermined by a competent person such as the building engineer or the architectof record or by the formwork designer. In addition, evidence in the record,and discussed here, indicates there is widespread opposition to use ofthe table as proposed for a number of other reasons which cannot be substantiatedor rejected by OSHA due to the lack of specific rationale provided withcommenter objections. For example, many said too many variables affectthe use of the table, but did not list the variables or discuss the basisfor their statement. Also, a review of the most recent ANSI A10.9 standard,the 1983 version, shows that the nationally recognized standard for formworkremoval is to determine that the concrete has sufficient strength to supportits weight and total loads involved by conducting the type and number oftests as specified by the designer of the formwork. (ANSI allows the engineer/architectto determine what the strength should be if this is not indicated on theformwork drawings.) Consequently, OSHA has removed Table Q-1 as an alternativeto following engineering specifications.Paragraph (e)(2) of the final rule prohibits the removal of reshoring untilthe concrete has attained adequate strength to support its weight and allloads in place upon it. This provision is similar to proposed andSection;1926.705(e)(2) which was based on a provision in section 6 of the ANSIA10.9-1983 standard.Three comments were received on the proposed provision concerning loadsplaced on the concrete. The PCA (Ex. 14-9) recommended that the words ``normallyexpected'' be added between the words ``all'' and ``loads.'' The BCTD (Ex.14-40) commented that the concrete should be supported until it has achievedthe strength to support all loads which may foreseeably be imposed on it.WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) recommended that reshoring remain in place until thestructure can support the loads imposed on it.The comments indicated that the PCA, BCTD, and WMACSA misconstrued theintent of this provision. Each commenter recommended language to addressloads to be imposed at a time after the reshoring had been removed. However,OSHA's intent was to address loads that were actually being supported bythe reshoring. In other words, if reshoring had been erected to supportloads that the concrete was unable to support, then the reshoring couldnot be removed until the concrete has attained adequate strength to supportits own weight and those loads_loads that were on the structure at theexact time that the reshoring was to be removed. The proposed provisiondid not address loads that would be imposed subsequent to the removal ofreshoring. That is, it was not OSHA's intent that this provision conflictwith andSection; 1926.701(a) which prohibits placing any construction loadon a concrete structure or portion of a concrete structure unless the employerdetermines, based on information received from a person who is qualifiedin structural design, that the structure or portion of the structure iscapable of supporting the loads.Because the commenters' concerns have been addressed via andSection; 1926.701(a),no revision of the proposed paragraph is necessary except to revise thelanguage to make it clear that the reshoring is to support the weight ofthe concrete and loads in place upon it. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph(e)(2) as revised. Section 1926.704 Requirements for precast concrete. Section 1926.704 of the final rule contains the requirements for precastconcrete. The requirements in this section were relocated from proposedandSection; 1926.706 to promote a more logically organized standard. Paragraph (a) of the final rule requires that precast concrete wall units,structural framing, and tilt-up wall panels be adequately supported toprevent overturning and to prevent collapse until permanent connectionsare completed. The intent of this provision is to prevent accidents suchas the one that occurred on March 31, 1978, when one employee was killed.The employee was erecting a precast concrete wall panel and the panel felland crushed the worker. The panel was not braced to prevent collapse (Ex.6). The existing construction regulations do not contain a specific requirementaddressing bracing of precast concrete panels, only the referenced ANSIA10.9-1970 does. However, the final rule requirements of this paragraphclearly set forth requirements for bracing precast members. Observanceof these requirements will prevent accidents such as the one describedhere. This paragraph has been relocated from andSection; 1926.706(a)(1) of theproposal and was based on section 9.4 of the ANSI A10.9-1983 standard whichcontains a similar provision. OSHA proposed that precast concrete wallunits, structural framing, or tilt-up wall panels be laterally supportedto resist overturning forces until permanent connections are completed.The final rule is the same as the proposed rule except the word ``laterally''was replaced with ``adequately,'' the word ``or'' was replaced with ``and''and the phrase ``to resist overturning forces'' was revised to read ``toprevent overturning and to prevent collapse.'' OSHA received two comments and one person testified at the hearing on thisprovision of the proposed rule. The NEA (Ex. 14-22) agreed with the proposedrule. However, they commented, ``* * * the completion of permanent connectionsshould not be required in instances where precast panels are provided adequatetemporary support prior to unhooking by temporary shoring, a temporaryerection connection or part of a permanent connection.'' OSHA agrees withthe commenter. OSHA does not intend for the final rule to require thatprecast concrete members be permanently secured prior to unhooking fromthe crane. The other commenter, WMACSA (Ex. 14-29), commented, ``redefineto mean only precast concrete structural framing.'' However, the WMACSAdid not explain the reasons for their recommendation. OSHA believes thatemployee injury could occur as a result of the collapse of any type ofprecast unit, including wall units and tilt-up wall panels, and that theproposed requirement to support such units has a direct bearing on employeesafety. Therefore, it has not redefined the provision to apply only toprecast structural members. In addition to the written comments, OSHA's expert witness, John Hanson(Tr. I, 92), testified that the coverage of the proposed rule would beexpanded by using the phrase ``to resist overturning forces or collapse.''OSHA agrees with the suggested change, acknowledging that its intent wasto address the collapse of precast members. After consideration of the above comments, OSHA determined that the proposedrule should be revised by replacing the word ``laterally'' with ``adequately,''the word ``or'' with ``and,'' and revising the phrase ``to resist overturningforces'' to read ``to prevent overturning and to prevent collapse.'' Theword ``laterally'' was deleted because the record demonstrates that precastconcrete members can be supported from directions other than from theirsides. Instead, OSHA has substituted the word ``adequately'' to allow theemployer some flexibility to determine what type of support will preventoverturning and collapse of the precast members. The word ``or'' was changedto ``and'' because it may not be clear that any and all precast concretewall units, structural framing members and tilt-up wall panels must besupported. The use of the word ``or'' may mistakenly lead employers tobelieve that if they are erecting one or more of the above types of precastmembers that they need only brace one ``or'' the other. OSHA intends thatall precast members be adequately supported and so stated this intentionwhen it discussed the proposed requirement at (50 FR 37549) where it usedthe word ``and.'' Finally, OSHA clarified the purpose of this requirementby stating the reason for this provision_to prevent overturning and toprevent collapse. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (a) as revised.Paragraph (b) specifies that lifting inserts which are embedded or otherwiseattached to tilt-up wall panels must be capable of supporting twice themaximum intended load applied or transmitted to them. Paragraph (c) specifiesthat lifting inserts which are embedded or otherwise attached to precastconcrete members, other than tilt-up members, must be capable of supportingat least four times the maximum intended load applied or transmitted tothem. Paragraph (d) specifies that lifting hardware must be capable ofsupporting at least 5 times the maximum intended load applied or transmittedto the hardware.Paragraphs (b) and (c) were relocated from proposed andSection; 1926.706(a)(4)(i)and (ii) which are essentially the same as the final rule. Paragraph (d)was not listed in the proposed rule but is essentially the same as theexisting requirement found in the ANSI A10.9-1970 standard which OSHA references.In fact, all of safety factors prescribed for precast operations are basedon existing requirements in the OSHA references ANSI A10.9-1970 standard.OSHA observes that all these requirements are essentially the same as therequirements specified in Section 9 of the most recent ANSI standard, A10.9-1983. OSHA received only one comment on the proposed provisions in paragraphs(b) and (c). The BCTD (Ex. 14-40) commented that OSHA was not completelyclear that the proposal provided the same degree of protection as the ANSIstandard on which OSHA based its proposed requirements. They also indicatedthat their concern was with making certain that the support system as installed_andnot the hardware in isolation_be required to meet the criteria establishedin ANSI's 1983 revisions. OSHA agrees with the BCTD and has added the phrase``which are embedded or otherwise attached to'' in the final provisionsto clarify the Agency's regulatory intent.  Additionally, the BCTD recommended that OSHA include ANSI's A10.9-1983requirement that lifting hardware have a factor of safety of five. OSHAagrees that the lifting hardware should have a factor of safety greaterthan the lifting inserts and acknowledges that a failure to maintain afactor of safety of at least five could have a negative impact on workersafety. In fact, this is an existing requirement which OSHA inadvertentlyfailed to include in the notice of proposed rulemaking. Therefore, OSHApromulgates paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) as revised.  Paragraph (e) of the final rule prohibits employees from being under precastconcrete members being lifted or tilted into position except those employeesrequired for the erection of those members. The intent of this provisionis to limit employee exposure and prevent injury caused by being struckby falling precast members. This paragraph was relocated from andSection;1926.706(a)(3) of the proposal which prohibited employees from being underprecast concrete members being lifted or tilted into position. The proposedrule was based on existing rules located in Sections 10.4 and 11.5 of theANSI A10.9-1970 (Ex. 9) which applied to tilt-up and lift-slab operations,respectively. Since both these rules were similar, OSHA hoped to combinethe provisions rather than have the same provision specified for each methodof erection. OSHA observes that the most current ANSI standard for Concreteand Masonry Work, ANSI A10.9-1983, in Sections 9 and 10, also containsessentially similar provisions.  The final rule is essentially the same as the proposed rule, except thatan exception for employees who are required for the erection of precastmembers has been made. OSHA observes that although this general requirementwas orignally intended to apply whenever a precast member was positioned_eitherby lifting, tilting or jacking (which would have included lift-slab operations)_therecent decision by OSHA to reopen the record on the lift-slab operationssection, precludes the application of this provision to lift-slab operations.Instead, lift-slab employers will follow the existing requirements whichhave been reprinted in the Appendix to andSection; 1926.705 of this FinalRule.  OSHA received two comments on the proposed rule. The NEA (Ex. 14-22) statedthat employees must spend some time under precast panels to align themwith the existing structure. NIOSH (Ex. 14-39) comments supported the proposedrule; however, NIOSH wanted to know whether the proposed rule would applyto a worker on or underneath a precast member who was aligning the memberwith connector inserts. OSHA recognizes that some workers, those who areactively engaged in the erection of the member, must be allowed to workunder the members which are being lifted or tilted into position. The finalrule clearly reflects this allowance. All other employees, however, areprohibited at all times from being under those precast members. Therefore,OSHA promulgates paragraph (e) as revised.  Section 1926.705 Lift-slab operations.  Section 1926.705 of the final rule has been reserved for the unique requirementsof lift-slab construction. Even though OSHA proposed specific requirementsfor lift-slab operations in andSection; 1926.706(b) of the proposed rule,this section of the standard is not being finalized in this document. Instead,is the subject of a separate rulemaking effort. OSHA has determined thatit is necessary to reopen the record to consider revision of the proposedrule on the standard addressing lift-slab construction. This would be donein order to address more adequately the information and evidence that willbe introduced into the public record as a result of OSHA's investigationof the collapse in Bridgeport, Connecticut. Pending competion of the aboveaction, the existing OSHA requirement to follow Section 11 of the AmericanNational Standard Safety Requirements for Concrete Construction and MasonryWork, ANSI A10.9-1970, remains in full force and effect for lift-slab construction.To aid employers in their compliance efforts, OSHA is reprinting theseANSI lift-slab requirements in the Appendix to andSection; 1926.705. In addition,OSHA reminds employers that existing andSection; 1926.305(a) and (b) alsocontain requirements relating to jacks used in the lift-slab operations.Section 1926.706 Masonry construction.Section 1926.706 of the final rule contains requirements for masonry construction.The intent of these provisions is to prevent accidents such as the onethat occurred on May 19, 1976, in which two employees were killed. Thetwo employees were tacking metal decking using an electric welder at ahigh school under construction (Ex. 4). A nearby masonry wall collapsed,struck the two employees, killing them. The existing construction regulationsdo not contain a specific requirement addressing bracing of masonry wallsor limiting access to the collapse zone. However, the final rule requirementsof this section clearly set forth requirements for protecting employeesfrom masonry wall collapses. Observance of these requirements will preventaccidents such as the one described here. Paragraph (a) of the final rule requires that the employer establish alimited access zone whenever a masonry wall is being constructed. Paragraph(a)(1) requires that the zone be established prior to the start of construction.Paragraph (a)(2) requires that the zone run a distance equal to the lengthof the wall and extend outward a distance equal to the height of the wallto be constructed, plus four feet. Paragraph (a)(3) requires the zone tobe established on the side of the wall which will be unscaffolded. Paragraph(a)(4) requires that the employer limit access to the zone to only thoseemployees who are actively engaged in constructing the wall. Paragraph(a)(5) requires the employer to keep the limited access zone in place untilthe wall is adequately supported to prevent overturning and to preventcollapse <T3>unless </T3>the height of the wall is over eight feet, then the limitedaccess zone must remain in place until the requirements of paragraph (b)below have been met. Paragraph (b) requires the employer to brace all masonry walls over eightfeet in height to prevent overturning and to prevent collapse <T3>unless</T3> the wall is adequately supported so that it will not overturnor collapse. The bracing shall remain in place until permanent supportingelements of the structure are in place. The requirements of the final rule differ substantially from the requirementsof the proposed rule. The proposed rule, andSection; 1926.707(a)(1), wouldhave required all masonry walls to be laterally supported to resist horizontalforces where such walls were not capable of withstanding the forces thatwill be applied to them during construction. OSHA further proposed in andSection;1926.707(a)(2) that the lateral supports for masonry walls be capable ofwithstanding a load of 15 pounds per square foot applied to the wall. Section1926.707(a)(2) has been deleted (see the discussion under <T3>Requirements Proposed but not Finalized below</T3>). OSHA based itsproposed requirements on the ANSI A10.9-1983 requirements for masonry construction.In connection with the proposed requirements, OSHA raised a specific issue(Issue No. 10) in the NPRM to gather information to determine if lateralsupport were only needed at certain heights. OSHA asked, among other questions,if pilasters, partition walls, end walls, and masonry walls with reinforcementwere adequate lateral supports, at what height should bracing be required,and the reasons why a particular height was recommended by the commenters.Several comments were received on the proposed provisions and the specificissue, including the following: CAL/OSHA (Ex. 14-2) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">After the first-story height, the walls should have lateral supports.Beyond 20 feet in height, the unsupported walls would probably collapse.They are usually supported by braces or tie-backs. </ITAG>The NCCSHAC (Ex. 14-16) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">By the very nature of the circular cross-sections of masonry chimneysand liners, these units are ``self-bracing.'' Further, chimney liners arenot exposed to wind load. We therefore recommend that this paragraph berevised to read: Masonry walls (except for industrial chimneys and liners),exposed to wind or other forces, shall be temporarily braced until thedesign lateral strength of the wall is reached or supporting members arein place to resist such forces as may be applied to them during construction.</ITAG>Associated General Contractors of Dallas (Ex. 14-8) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">The engineer's design (load bearing, non-load bearing) is complexand therefore the height of masonry walls requiring lateral support cannotbe aribtrarily stated.</ITAG>Safety Consultants (Ex. 14-25) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">Masonry walls while under construction should be shored to withstanda wind load of at least 80 mph and that shoring system should be approvedand inspected by the structural design engineers.</ITAG>Gilbane Building Company (Ex. 14-28) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">With regard to masonry walls, the recommendations in the masonry instituteshould be followed. There are too many conditions which must be consideredby a competent engineer to give a firm answer at what height the wallsshould be laterally supported. This can vary from five feet to ten feetto twenty feet depending upon conditions and design. The major reason fordetermining the height of support is the amount of lateral load, i.e.,wind that must be resisted. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The question of whether pilasters, partition walls, end walls, andmasonry walls with reinforcement are adequate lateral support is one thatmust be answered by a competent engineer. It is dependent upon the lateralload that is place on the wall that is being supported. If it is to actas a beam, it must be reinforced as a beam. If you expect it to act asa supported column, then it must be reinforced as one. These are decisionswhich must be made by a competent engineer, not by a regulatory agencysuch as OSHA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The current industry practice is to provide lateral support for wallson both sides of the walls. As is known from the many failures and collapsesthat occur with the type of construction, this is not uniformly practiced.</ITAG>The WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) suggested the provision be revised as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Shoring and bracing. Masonry walls shall be temporarily shored andbraced until designed lateral strength is reached to prevent collapse dueto wind or other forces.</ITAG>Technical Safety Associates (Ex. 14-34) commented that masonry walls oversix (6) feet high should be temporarily shored and braced. The National Constructors Association (Ex. 14-36) commented that OSHA shouldnot specify the height of masonry walls requiring temporary lateral support,further stating that the proposed provision requires lateral support ifand when it is needed, which is appropriate. The commenter identified sevenvariables which must be considered to determine the need for bracing. General Shale Products Corp. (Ex. 14-43) questioned the reasonablenessof OSHA's proposed bracing requirements and suggested that other approachesbe considered such as limited access zones, posting of signs and barricadingof potential hazards.And finally, the Mason Contractors Association of America (MCAA) (Ex. 14-30)submitted a suggestion endorsed by employer groups, unions, and manufacturers,including the Mason Contractors Association of America, the National ConcreteMasonry Association, the Portland Cement Association, the Brick Instituteof America, the Bricklayers andamp; Allied Craftsmen International Union,the Laborers International Union of North America, and the InternationalMasonry Institute. OSHA believes these groups constitute a balanced cross-sectionof all interests involved in masonry construction. They suggested establishinga limited access zone, which would be restricted to workers actively engagedin constructing the walls, and requiring the bracing of unsupported walls<T3>over 8 feet </T3>in height which are not capable of withstanding forcesto be applied during construction. The MCAA also discussed the injury dataavailable from OSHA's Fatality and Catastrophe Abstracts involving masonrywall collapses and how they arrived at this consensus suggestion. Accordingto the MCAA, the injury data they discussed included 20 incidents involvinginjuries and deaths. In 11 of the cases, the walls were not braced at all.In four of the cases, the walls had been braced, but the bracing had beenremoved prematurely. In another 4 cases, bracing was used, but the conditionof the bracing rendered it ineffective.These comments prompted OSHA to seek additional information in its hearingnotice. In that notice, OSHA discussed the comment that had been receivedfrom the MCAA and which was supported by employer groups, unions, and manufacturers.OSHA also asked for accident data on wall collapses.In response, OSHA heard from both its expert witnesses and several otherswho attended the hearing. OSHA's expert witness, John Hanson (Ex. 18) testified,``I do not believe that all walls with a nonsupported height of eight feetor less can be excluded from the requirement for bracing. It becomes afunction of the width of that wall as well as the height of the wall.''Mr. Hanson's statement led to questioning by others at the hearing. Specifically,the Safety Chairman of the Mason Contractors of Missouri, asked Mr. Hansondidn't he think that walls less than eight feet should be excluded fromthe bracing requirements (Tr. I, 99). After some discussion to clarifythe question, Mr. Hanson responded by citing various factors that wouldhave to be considered before deciding whether or not a wall under eightfeet needed bracing. He also said, ``There are many eight-foot walls thatI would be willing to accept as not needing bracing, but there are manyother eight-foot high walls in my mind would require bracing . . . thereforeI do not believe a requirement based just on a matter of height alone issufficient.''OSHA's other expert witness, Ingvar Schousboe also testified on the provisionfor masonry construction. He said, ``For part (c) of that, I think it wouldbe reasonable to consider the thickness limitation for an eight-foot highunbraced wall.'' (Tr. I, 142).A representative from the International Masonry Institute, testifying onbehalf of the Masonry Industry Committee (Tr. I, 148), restated the positionput forth by MCAA (as discussed above, Ex. 14-30), in their written comment_creationof a limited access zone, exclusion of all walls under 8 feet from anybracing requirements, and requiring bracing for walls over 8 feet whichwere not capable of withstanding forces during construction. The representativecommented that the revisions represented an informed consensus recommendationof groups familiar with the hazards of masonry construction, and urgedOSHA to adopt their suggested revisions.Upon completion of the MCAA's testimony, the representative was questionedon his thoughts on the statement made by OSHA's expert witness_that wallsunder 8 feet should not be excluded from bracing simply because of height.The MCAA representative commented, ``The eight feet is certainly not amagic number. But it is a number that has been used as a kind of rule ofthumb. In masonry construction, there are other items that are rules ofthumb from past experience and common sense. Eight feet happens to be oneof those numbers.'' He further commented that the eight feet was used byFactory Mutual in their prevention loss data and that he thought FactoryMutual considered masonry walls below eight feet not to pose a hazard.It is evident from the comments received that there is a wide variety ofopinions regarding the height at which a masonry wall should be braced.As discussed, the record shows recommendations ranging from 5 to 20 feetas the appropriate height. Few, if any, of the recommendations were accompaniedby the evidence or support necessary for OSHA's use in promulgating a finalrule. Nor was there adequate discussion or comment of the benefits of establishinga limited access zone in lieu of bracing walls with an unsupported heightof eight feet or less.Nonetheless, OSHA feels the record has adequately established that masonrywalls do collapse and worker protection is needed (see discussion aboveand the NPRM at 37543). OSHA has decided, therefore, after carefully reviewingall the comments and testimony, the literature on average wind speed, andthe accident data on wall collapses as previously discussed, that the suggestionput forth by the MCAA has merit, as reflected in the final rule. OSHA believesthat creation of a limited access zone for all walls and the bracing ofall unsupported walls over 8 feet in height, provides an appropriate levelof protection to employees. The limited access zone will limit the numberof employees exposed to the hazard to those employees who are activelyengaged in constructing the wall and who most likely, would be on the sideof the wall away from the collapse area. If the wall is 8 feet or underin height, the limited access zone must remain in place until the wallis adequately supported to prevent overturning and collapse. Such supportcan be obtained as a result of the wall having reached sufficient strengthto prevent overturning and collapse, having been permanently supported,or having been braced. However, if the wall is over eight feet in heightand unsupported, the wall must be braced before the limited access zonecan be removed and the bracing must remain in place until the permanentsupporting elements of the structure are in place. OSHA believes that theseprovisions provide a level of safety equivalent to that which would havebeen afforded by the proposed requirement.OSHA notes, however, that a part of the recommendation of the MCAA doesnot appear to be necessary for inclusion in the final rule. Specifically,OSHA has not included the language of the MCAA recommendation which seemsto imply that masonry walls supported during construction by intersectingwalls, piers, and pilasters will have adequate support to prevent overturningand collapse. While OSHA recognizes that intersecting walls, piers, andpilasters which are constructed as the wall is being constructed may indeedprovide such support, OSHA also recognizes that it would be necessary tospecify the number of intersecting walls, piers, and pilasters that wouldbe needed based on the length of the wall being constructed if OSHA wereto incorporate in the final rule, the entire recommendation of the MCAA.For example, OSHA does not believe that a wall 200 feet long would be sufficientlysupported because it had one intersecting wall, located 10 feet from oneend of the wall. In any event, such elaboration is unnecessary in the finalrule since the provision has been written in performance language, requiringthe employer to adequately brace all walls over 8 feet in height to preventoverturning and collapse. This provision, of course, as discussed above,does not apply where walls are sufficiently supported such that they arecapable of withstanding the forces applied during construction that couldcause overturning and collapse. Intersecting walls, piers, pilasters, andend walls as well as having reached their designed strength (self-support)are examples of support that may be used to withstand forces that couldcause overturning and collapse. Thus, employers should consider many factorsthat are appropriate for determining which walls to brace and how to bracethe walls. In light of the above, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.706 asrevised.Requirements Proposed But Not FinalizedOSHA observes that there are several requirements in the proposed rulethat it has decided not to finalize. First, OSHA proposed in andSection;1926.705(a)(3) that formwork be strengthened whenever reinforcing steel,materials, or equipment are stored on top of the formwork. There were severalcomments received on the proposed rule. Commenters (Exs. 14-9, 14-10, 14-11,and 18) pointed out that formwork may not require strengthening in allcases. They suggested that words like ``if necessary'' or ``adequate''be placed in the rule for clarity. Two commenters (Exs. 19 and 14-29) suggestedthat this rule could be deleted since the rule in andSection; 1926.703(a)(1)of the proposal already addressed the strength of formwork. After carefullyconsidering all the comments received, OSHA agrees that andSection; 1926.703(a)(1)adequately addresses the hazard which would have been regulated by andSection;1926.705(a)(3). OSHA, therefore, has decided not to finalize proposed andSection;1926.705(a)(3).Two similar provisions proposed, but not promulgated, are found in andSection;andSection;1926.706(a)(2) and 1926.707(a)(2) of the proposal. Both of the proposedprovisions required lateral supports to be capable of supporting a loadof 15 pounds per square foot (PSF) applied to the precast units (andSection;1926.706(a)) or to the masonry walls (andSection; 1926.707(a)). These twoprovisions are being discussed together because most commenters indicatedthat their comment applied to both provisions and both provisions havenot been finalized for the same reason.The proposed provision in andSection;1926.706(a)(1) was based on paragraph10.3 of ANSI A10.9-1970 (Ex. 9) which is incorporated into OSHA's existingrule by reference. The proposed rule, however, did not specify the 10 psflimit of the A10.9-1970 standard, but instead, specified the 15 psf limitset forth in the updated A10.9-1983 ANSI concrete standard. The proposedprovision in andSection;1926.707(a)(1) was also based on the ANSI A10.9-1983standard.OSHA received several comments on the proposed provisions. Three commenters(Exs. 14-9, 14-13, and 14-31) objected to increasing the support requirementfrom 10 pounds per square foot to 15 pounds per square foot. They objectedto the proposed requirements because they contented that employees wouldnot be working in 70 mile per hour winds and yet OSHA was requiring bracingequivalent to a wind load of 70 mph. For example, the AGC (Ex. 14-31) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">Excessive bracing, would cause additional employee exposure when requiringthat lateral supports be capable of withstanding a load of 15 pounds persquare foot (PSF). At 15 PSF walls could withstand winds in excess of 70mph. Since OSHA's responsibility is employee safety, it would be realisticto believe that employees would not be exposed to a hazard as they wouldnot be working in such weather conditions. Consequently this proposed requirementis not within the scope of OSHA's responsibilities.</ITAG>Milwaukee Construction Industry Safety Council (Ex. 14-19) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">Requiring walls be braced to withstand a lateral force of 15 lbs isexcessive. It requires a wind in excess of 70 mph to produce that amountof force * * * we suggest a requirement for a braced wall to withstanda force of 5 lbs psf is sufficient to protect employees without creatinghazards associated with excessive bracing.</ITAG>Another commenter, WMACSA (Ex. 14-29), requested that OSHA clarify whetherthe requirements for the temporary supports were for the total load, includingbracing design, or just the wind load. The SSFI (Tr. I, 178) stated thatOSHA should not specify in andSection;andSection;1926.706 and 1926.707 requirementsfor lateral support. The SSFI testified as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">These forces should not be specified in the OSHA standards. The reasonis that one specified support force may not be appropriate for the varyingcurcumstances on all job sites. The standard should affirmatively requirethat consideration for wall bracing should take into account such mattersas the prevailing wind pressure load, mean wind speed gradients at variousheights, wind directionality, terrain roughness and building geometry,wall location and time of the year. For example, there may be cases inwhich ground floor walls may require minimal support force, and subsequentlevels require substantially greater bracing force requirements above 15PSF. Because of these numerous variables, the Contractor and Engineer/Architectof record must be given the responsibility but, still, flexibility in providingadequate wind bracing support throughout the entire construction process.</ITAG>After careful consideration of the comments and testimony received, OSHAhas determined that the proposed rules discussed above are unnecessarilyspecific and redundant. OSHA observes that andSection;1926.704 (a) adequatelyaddresses supporting precast members and andSection;1926.706 adequately addressessupporting masonry walls. OSHA feels worker safety would not be reducedif the proposed provisions in question were not promulgated since the hazardsare adequately addressed in other provisions. Therefore, OSHA has not promulgatedproposed andSection;andSection;1926.706(a)(2) or 1926.707(a)(2).Additionally, OSHA proposed to delete a number of requirements which werespecific to shoring operations. OSHA felt that these were redundant sincethe hazards addressed by the specific requirements were adequately addressedby the existing general requirements for shoring. OSHA received no commenton its proposal to delete these specific requirements for shoring and therefore,deletes these paragraphs as proposed. The following table lists the deletedspecific requirement, the corresponding proposed general requirement, andthe location of the general requirement in the final rule.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,b1,tp0,p6,7/8,g1,t1,i1,xl30,xl30,xs44</C> <H1>Existing</H1><H1>Proposed</H1><H1>Final</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.700(e)(2)(i)<D>1926.705(a)(1)</D><D>1926.703(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.700(e)(2)(ii)<D>1926.705(a)(1)</D><D>1926.703(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.700(e)(2)(iii)<D>1926.705(a)(1)</D><D>1926.703(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.700(e)(2)(iv)<D>1926.705(a)(1)</D><D>1926.703(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(c)(1)<D>1926.705(c)(2)(ii)</D><D>1926.703(b)(3)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(c)(2)<D>1926.705(a)(1)</D><D>1926.703(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(c)(3)<D>1926.705(a)(1)</D><D>1926.703(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(d)(1)<D>1926.705(a)(1)</D><D>1926.703(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(d)(4)<D>1926.705(a)(1)</D><D>1926.703(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(d)(6)<D>1926.705(c)(2)(ii)</D><D>1926.703(b)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(d)(7)<D>1926.705(c)(2)(ii)</D><D>1926.703(b)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(d)(8)<D>1926.705(c)(2)(ii)</D><D>1926.703(b)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(d)(9)<D>1926.705(c)(2)(ii)</D><D>1926.703(b)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1926.701(d)(10)<D>1926.705(a)(1)</D><D>1926.703(a)(1)</D></ITAG></ITAG>Finally, OSHA Notes that it raised one issue in the NPRM and one issuein the hearing notice that have not resulted in a final requirement norhas OSHA discussed them in the final rule in relation to any of the proposedor finalized provisions.The issue raised in the NPRM was Issue andplusmin;11 in which OSHA statedthat the proposed rule was generally written in performance language toprovide flexibility for compliance and asked if any of the requirementsin the proposal should be made more specific?In response, the WMACSA (Ex. 14-29) commented, ``It is essential that thenew standard for concrete construction contain both specific and performancelevels of compliance requirements.'' They went on the comment that, ``Itis almost irresponsible to promulgate standards with the great latitudeoffered in a `Performance' concept.''Speaking for the need for specific standards, OSHA's expert witness, JohnHanson (Ex. 18), testified, ``I agree very strongly with the comment thatit is almost irresponsible to promulgate standards with the great latitudeoffered in a performance concept.'' He also said, ``Where the issue withrespect to safety is clear or can be clearly defined, I believe that itis appropriate and preferable to establish a specific requirement. Thedanger with a specific requirements is that there may be special circumstanceswhere it is impractical to perform the construction without violating therequirement.'' To address these special circumstances, Mr. Hanson recommendedthat a statement be added in andSection; 1926.700 to the effect that, ``Therequirements in this Subpart do not need to be met if circumstances areencountered which make the construction impractical. However, before anyrequirement is not met, alternative requirements shall be established thateliminate or control the hazard.''However, OSHA received a number of comments (Exs. 14-10, 14-16, 14-28,14-31) which indicated agreement with performance standards, oppositionto specification standards, and the need for flexibility. The AGC (Ex.14-31) comment summarizes the vast majority of the comments received onthis issue. The AGC wrote, ``AGC believes that performance standards providethe most flexibility when applied to the construction industry. The generalconsensus is that specific standards preclude contractors from compliancebecause practicality has not been considered. Specific standards are notnecessarily the safest method available.''CAL/OSHA (Ex. 14-2) commented that performance standards are probably moredesirable throughout the industry.OSHA observes that none of the commenters answered the specific questionin the NPRM; i.e., ``What if any of the requirements in the proposal shouldOSHA make more specific?'' There being no comment on the need to reviseany performance standards to specification standards, OSHA has not takenany action on this issue. OSHA appreciates the comments and opinions expressedon the issue of performance versus specification.In the hearing notice, OSHA indicated that it had received several commentsthat recommended new regulations be established for the following tasks:(a) Flying Forms;(b) Natural Drafting Cooling Tower Construction;(c) Cleaning Concrete Pumping Systems;(d) Concrete Buggies;(e) Concrete Construction Housekeeping;(f) Storage and Handling of Concrete Blocks and Bricks;(g) Pretensioning and Post-tensioning Concrete; and(h) Handling and Storage of Precast Concrete Members.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">OSHA asked for data, evidence, and documentation to demonstrate risksassociated with the above listed tasks and asked for suggested ways tocontrol these risks.OSHA received little additional information in response to this issue.OSHA did hear testimony from its expert witness, John Hanson (Ex. 18),who said that he agreed with the comments that additional regulation wereneeded in a number of areas. The data, evidence and documentation to supportthe recommendations, however, were not forthcoming.The data, evidence, and documentation received in response to this issuewas so limited that it was insufficient to enable OSHA to determine ifadditional regulation is needed. Therefore, no action has been taken atthis time in response to the issue raised in the hearing notice with theexception of issue (g) which has been discussed above in connection withandSection; 1926.701(c)(1) and (2). Additionally, OSHA observes that someof the items listed are already covered in some detail by existing Part1926 regulations. For example, Subpart C addressed housekeeping for allconstruction sites. The hazards associated with storage and handling ofmaterials are addressed in Subpart H. Thus, the concerns of commentersregarding items (e), (f), (g), and (h) above have been addressed. OSHAwill continue its efforts to determine if additional regulation in anyof the areas listed is needed.<ITAG tagnum="85">IV. Summary of the Regulatory Impact and Regulatory Flexibility Assessment </ITAG>Introduction Executive Order 12291 (46 FR 13197, February 19, 1981) requires that aregulatory analysis be conducted for any rule having major economic consequenceson the national economy, geographical regions, individual industries, orlevels of government. In addition, the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980(Pub. L. 96-353, 94 Stat. 1164 (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>)) requires the Occupational Safety and Health Administration(OSHA) to determine whether the proposed regulation will have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities. Consistent with these requirements, OSHA has prepared a Final RegulatoryImpact and Regulatory Flexibility Assessment for the current and revisedstandards governing Concrete and Masonry Construction. This analysis includesa profile of affected firms and industries, a description of the regulatoryand nonregulatory alternatives, estimates of the benefits and the costsof full compliance for both the existing and revised standards, and thepotential economic and environmental impacts. The complete analysis, assummarized in this section, is based on data and information provided byJACA Management Consultants in <T3>An Economic Impact Statement/Technological Feasibility Study of the</T3><T3>Proposed Revisions to Subpart Q Part 1926.700 Through 1926.702, </T3>whichis available in the rulemaking record and on additional information submittedto the record. The Secretary has determined that this action would not be a ``major rule''as defined by section 3(b) of Executive Order 12291 as it will not havean annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more, cause major increasesin costs or prices for individual industries, or have any other significantadverse effects. The Secretary also certifies that this action will nothave a significant impact on a substantial number of small entities asdefined by the Regulatory Flexibility Act. The Final Regulatory Impactand Regulatory Flexibility Assessment is available for inspection and copyingin the rulemaking docket. Statement of the Problem and Summary of Industry Profile The existing standards governing safety hazards associated with concreteand masonry construction in Subpart Q of 29 CFR Part 1926 were adoptedin 1971 with only minor revisions since that time. A number of factorshave led OSHA to propose revisions to Subpart Q at this time. First, therequirements of the standard are complicated and confusing as a resultof the incorporation by reference of the American National Standards Institute(ANSI) standard for concrete, formwork, and shoring (ANSI A10.9-1970).The ANSI standard, in turn, references that of the American Concrete Institute(ACI No. 347). Thus, the contractor who wishes to comply with OSHA regulationswould need to refer to up to three overlapping, and possibly conflicting,sets of rules. To further complicate matters, Subpart Q only requires thatany equipment and materials that are used meet ANSI standards, not thatthe equipment itself be used. Moreover, both ANSI and ACI have updatedtheir standards but the existing Subpart Q still refers to the old ANSIstandard. In addition to these difficulties, Subpart Q is becoming increasingly outof date, creating gaps in coverage. Hazards associated with the collapseof masonry walls have never been adequately covered. Newer technologies,such as the use of precast concrete, are not addressed by the standard,and techniques for in-place testing of concrete are inadquately considered.A final difficulty has been that Subpart Q's requirements for formworkdesign and removal have been very narrowly interpreted by AdministrativeLaw Judges. The standard requires that they be adequate during the placementof concrete. This has been intepreted to mean that formwork that collapsedimmediately before or after placement was not in violation of the standard.For all of these reasons, OSHA is revising Subpart Q at this time. Thethree major purposes of the revisions are to clarify and simplify the standard,to cover inadequately addressed hazards, and to incorporate recent advancesin concrete construction technology. Concrete and masonry work occurs across a broad range of four-digit StandardIndustrial Classification (SICs) codes within the construction industry.OSHA has determined that the proposal would affect all of SIC 15 (BuildingConstruction), and all but SIC 1611, (Street and Highway Construction)in SIC 16. In SIC 17, SICs 1741 (Masonry), 1751 (Carpentering), 1771 (ConcreteWork), 1794 (Excavation and Foundation Work), and 1799 (Special Trade ContractorsNot Elsewhere Classified) would also be affected. OSHA has assumed thatvirtually all firms with paid employees within these affected SICs wouldbe affected by the standard, although this is doubtlessly an overestimate,particularly for special trade contractors. There were 246,975 firms inthese SICs in 1984. OSHA has also estimated the amount of construction that would be affectedby the revised standard. It is estimated to affect about 12.6 percent oftotal new construction, or about $48.8 billion in 1987. OSHA has also estimatedthe affected population in several ways. The best estimate of the populationpotentially at risk is about 503,369 full-time equivalent workers in 1987.Costs, Benefits and Feasibility OSHA has estimated the actual compliance costs required by the existingstandard and the incremental costs for the revised standard. Annualizedcosts of compliance with the current standard would be approximately $5.6million. Full compliance with the revised standard would cost approximatelyan additional $38.2 million. These costs do not include estimates for anychanges in the lift-slab provisions as these will be addressed in a separate<T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. Based solely on the fatalities avoided, this would translate into a costper fatality avoided of about $119,000 for coming into full compliancewith the existing standard and about $516,000 per fatality avoided forthe incremental costs of the revised standard. These costs and thus thecost per fatality avoided would of course also be offset by the lost workdayand nonlost workday injuries avoided and the cost savings related to propertylosses. OSHA has also estimated the potential cost savings resulting from concreteand masonry accidents that would more than offset the increased costs ofcompliance. These cost savings resulted from the indirect costs of accidentssuch as property damage, scheduling delays, increased insurance premiums,and lost worktime. Based on the number of fatalities and injuries thatwill be avoided under full compliance it is estimated that these cost savingswould be about $348 million annually. OSHA has calculated the maximum impact on profits of the revised standard,assuming a worst case where contractors would bear all of the costs. Dueto the incremental costs, the largest potential impact of the proposedstandard would be on Masonry and Stonework which could experience a 55percent decline in return on assets, from 6.5 percent to 2.9 percent. OSHAhas also estimated the potential impact on output and employment. The impactsare expected to be quite small for all industries except Masonry and Stoneworkwhere there is potential for output and employment declines of about 2.65percent. The revised standard would be more protective than is the current standard.Full compliance with the present Subpart Q would prevent an estimated 47fatalities, 2,259 lost workday injuries, and 1,689 nonlost workday injuriesannually. Full compliance with the revised standard would prevent an additional74 fatalities, 1,556 lost workday injuries and 1,469 nonlost workday injuriesannually. Regulatory Flexibility Assessment OSHA has evaluated the expected cost of compliance for small entities.For the purpose of this analysis, a small entity has been defined as afirm having nine or fewer employees. Approximately 82 percent of the affectedfirms would fall within this size category. OSHA has estimated that evenin Masonry and Stonework, where the impact is potentially the greatest,the cost per firm would be approximately $339 for the smallest size class.In addition, the standard would not require large capital expendituresor any sort that would put small firms, with limited access to funds, ata relative disadvantage. Nor is special technical expertise required forcompliance that would be beyond the resources of small firms. For the above reasons, and pursuant to the Regulatory Flexibility Act,OSHA certifies that, while the revised standard may affect a substantialnumber of small entities, it is not expected to have a significant economicimpact for these small entities. Environmental Impact Assessment_Finding of No Significant Impact This standard has been reviewed in accordance with the requirements ofthe National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969 (42 U.S.C. 4231 <T3>et seq</T3>.), the guidelines of the Council on Environmental Quality(CEQ) (40 CFR Part 1500), and OSHA's DOL NEPA Procedures (29 CPR Part 11).As a result of this review, the Assistant Secretary for OSHA has determinedthat the revised rule would have no significant environmental impact. The revisions consist primarily of work practices and procedures, includingrequirements for reinforcing steel, concrete placement, equipment, formwork,precast concrete, and masonry construction. In addition the revisions includea clarification of the language of the subpart to eliminate ambiguities,uninformative provisions, and redundancies found in the existing standards.To the extent that these safety procedures are in place and are integratedinto daily construction operations, the potential for occupational accidentsand injuries will be reduced and the safety of the workplace will be enhanced.These changes will not affect the environment outside the workplace andare generally excluded under Subpart B. andSection; 11.10 of the DOL NEPARegulations (29 CFR Part 11) because they are unlikely to influence air,water or soil quality, plant or animal life, the use of land or other aspectsof the environment. Although activities in the vicinity of construction work as well as thedisposal of materials removed from construction sites may tend to impacton the local environment, there is no reason to believe that there willbe any adverse impact on air, water or soil quality beyond what will ordinarilyoccur from such construction operations. That is, the revisions will notalter the nature of these operations, nor further affect the makeup ordisposal of the material generated or removed during concrete and masonryconstruction work. <ITAG tagnum="84">V. OMBV Approval Under the Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>This subpart contains a collection of information in andSection; 1926.703(a)(3).This provision requires employers to maintain a copy of their formworkplans at the job site. OMB has reviewed this collection and approved itthrough June 1991. The approval number is 1218-0095.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. State Plan Requirements</ITAG>The 25 States with their own OSHA-approved occupational safety and healthplans must review their existing standard within six months of the publicationdate of the final standard or show OSHA why there is no need for action,e.g., because an existing State standard covering this area is already``at least as effective'' as the revised Federal standard. These Statesare: Alaska, Arizona, California, Connecticut (State and local governmentworkers only), Hawaii, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Maryland, Michigan, Minnesota,Nevada, New Mexico, New York (State and local government workers only),North Carolina, Oregon, Puerto Rico, South Carolina, Tennessee, Utah, Vermont,Virginia, Virgin Islands, Washington and Wyoming.<ITAG tagnum="84"> List of Subjects in 29 CFR Part 1926</ITAG>Concrete placement, Construction safety, Formwork, Masonry Construction,Occupational safety and health, Precast concrete.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Authority</ITAG>This document was prepared under the directon of John A. Pendergrass, AssistantSecretary of Labor for Occupational Safety and Health, U.S. Departmentof Labor, Third and Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210.Accordingly, pursuant to sections 4, 6, and 8 of the Occupational Safetyand Health Act of 1970 (84 Stat. 1593, 29 U.S.C. 653, 655, and 657); section107 of the Contract Work Hours and Safety Standards Act (38 Stat. 96, 40U.S.C. 333); Secretary of Labor's Order No. 9-83 (48 FR 35736); and 29CFR Part 1911, Subpart Q of Part 1926 of Title 29 of the Code of FederalRegulations is amended as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, this 10th day of June 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John A. Pendergrass,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of Labor.</ITAG>Part 1926 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations is amended asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1926_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. By revising Subpart Q of 29 CFR Part 1926 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart Q_Concrete and Masonry Construction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.700 Scope, application, and definitions, applicable to this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.701 General requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.702 Requirements for equipment and tools.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.703 Requirements for cast-in-place concrete.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.704 Requirements for precast concrete.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.705 Requirements for lift-slab operations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.706 Requirements for masonry construction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix A to Subpart Q_References to Subparts of Part 1926</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart Q_Concrete and Masonry Construction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 107, Contract Work Hours and Safety StandardsAct (Construction Safety Act) (40 U.S.C. 333); Secs. 4, 6, and 8, OccupationalSafety and Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, and 657); Secretaryof Labor's Order No. 12-71 (36 FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059), or 9-83 (48FR 3536), as applicable; and 29 CFR Part 1911.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1926.700 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope, application, and definitions applicable to this subpart.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope and application. </T3>This subpart sets forth requirements toprotect all construction employees from the hazards associated with concreteand masonry construction operations performed in workplaces covered under29 CFR Part 1926. In addition to the requirements in Subpart Q, other relevantprovisions in Parts 1910 and 1926 apply to concrete and masonry constructionoperations.(b) <T3>Definitions applicable to this subpart. </T3>In addition to the definitionsset forth in andSection; 1926.32, the following definitions apply to thissubpart.(1) ``Bull float'' means a tool used to spread out and smooth concrete.(2) ``Formwork'' means the total system of support for freshly placed orpartically cured concrete, including the mold or sheeting (form) that isin contract with the concrete as well as all supporting members includingshores, reshores, hardware, braces, and related hardware.(3) ``Lift slab'' means a method of concrete construction in which floor,and roof slabs are cast on or at ground level and, using jacks, liftedinto position.(4) ``Limited access zone'' means an area alongside a masonry wall, whichis under construction, and which is clearly demarcated to limit accessby employees.(5) ``Precast concrete'' means concrete members (such as walls, panels,slabs, columns, and beams) which have been formed, cast, and cured priorto final placement in a structure.(6) ``Reshoring'' means the construction operation in which shoring equipment(also called reshores or reshoring equipment) is placed, as the originalforms and shores are removed, in order to support partially cured concreteand construction loads.(7) ``Shore'' means a supporting member that resists a compressive forceimposed by a load.(8) ``Vertical slip forms'' means forms which are jacked vertically duringthe placement of concrete.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1926.701</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General requirements</ITAG>(a) <T3>Construction loads. </T3>No construction loads shall be placed on aconcrete structure or portion of a concrete structure unless the employerdetermines, based on information received from a person who is qualifiedin structural design, that the structure or portion of the structure iscapable of supporting the loads.(b) <T3>Reinforcing steel. </T3>All protruding reinforcing steel, onto andinto which employees could fall, shall be guarded to eliminate the hazardof impalement.(c) <T3>Post-tensioning operations. </T3>(1) No employee (except those essentialto the post-tensioning operations) shall be permitted to be behind thejack during tensioning operations.(2) Signs and barriers shall be erected to limit employee access to thepost-tensioning area during tensioning operations.(d) <T3>Riding concrete buckets. </T3>No employee shall be permitted to rideconcrete buckets.(e) <T3>Working under loads. </T3>(1) No employee shall be permitted to workunder concrete buckets while buckets are being elevated or lowered intoposition.(2) To the extent practical, elevated concrete buckets shall be routedso that no employee, or the fewest number of employees, are exposed tothe hazards associated with falling concrete buckets.(f) <T3>Personal protective equipment. </T3>(1) No employee shall be permittedto apply a cement, sand, and water mixture through a pneumatic hose unlessthe employee is wearing protective head and face equipment.(2) No employee shall be permitted to place or tie reinforcing steel morethan six feet (1.8 m) above any adjacent working surface unless the employeeis protected by the use of a safety belt or equivalent fall protectionmeeting the criteria of Subpart E of this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1926.702</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for equipment and tools.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Bulk cement storage. </T3>(1) Bulk storage bins, containers, and silosshall be equipped with the following:(i) Conical or tapered bottoms; and(ii) Mechanical or pneumatic means of starting the flow of material.(2) No employee shall be permitted to enter storage facilities unless theejection system has been shut down, locked out, and tagged to indicatethat the ejection system is not to be operated.(b) <T3>Concrete mixers. </T3>Concrete mixers with one cubic yard (.8 m3) orlarger loading skips shall be equipped with the following:(1) A mechanical device to clear the skip of materials; and(2) Guardrails installed on each side of the skip.(c) <T3>Power concrete trowels. </T3>Powered and rotating type concrete trowelingmachines that are manually guided shall be equipped with a control switchthat will automatically shut off the power whenever the hands of the operatorare removed from the equipment handles.(d) <T3>Concrete buggies. </T3>Concrete buggy handles shall not extend beyondthe wheels on either side of the buggy.(e) <T3>Concrete pumping systems. </T3>(1) Concrete pumping systems using dischargepipes shall be provided with pipe supports designed for 100 percent overload.(2) Compressed air hoses used on concrete pumping system shall be providedwith positive fail-safe joint connectors to prevent separation of sectionswhen pressurized.(f) <T3>Concrete buckets. </T3>(1) Concrete buckets equipped with hydraulicor pneumatic gates shall have positive safety latches or similar safetydevices installed to prevent premature or accidental dumping. (2) Concrete buckets shall be deisigned to prevent concrete from hangingup on top and the sides.(g) <T3>Tremies. </T3>Sections of tremies and similar concrete conveyancesshall be secured with wire rope (or equivalent materials in addition tothe regular couplings or connections.(h) <T3>Bull floats.</T3> Bull float handles, used where they might contactenergized electrical conductors, shall be constructed of nonconductivematerial or insulated with a nonconductive sheath whose electrical andmechanical characteristics provide the equivalent protection of a handleconstructed of nonconductive material.(i) <T3>Masonry saws. </T3>(1) Masonry saws shall be guarded with a semicircularenclosure over the blade.(2) A method for retaining blade fragments shall be incorporated in thedesign of the semicircular enclosure.(j) <T3>Lockout/Tagout Procedures.</T3> (1) No employee shall be permittedto perform maintenance or repair activity on equipment (such as compressors,mixers, screens or pumps used for concrete and masonry construction activities)where the inadvertent operation of the equipment could occur and causeinjury, unless all potentially hazardous energy sources have been lockedout and tagged.(2) Tags shall read <T3>Do Not Start</T3> or similar language to indicate that the equipmentis not to be operated.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1926.703</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for cast-in-place concrete.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General requirements for formwork.</T3> (1) Formwork shall be designed,fabricated, erected, supported, braced and maintained so that it will becapable of supporting without failure all vertical and lateral loads thatmay reasonably be anticipated to be applied to the formwork. Formwork whichis designed, fabricated, erected, supported, braced and maintained in conformancewith the Appendix to this section will be deemed to meet the requirementsof this paragraph.(2) Drawings or plans, including all revisions, for the jack layout, formwork(including shoring equipment), working decks, and scaffolds, shall be availableat the jobsite.(b) <T3>Shoring and reshoring.</T3> (1) All shoring equipment (including equipmentused in reshoring operations) shall be inspected prior to erection to determinethat the equipment meets the requirements specified in the formwork drawings.(2) Shoring equipment found to be damaged such that its strength is reducedto less than that required by andSection; 1926.703(a)(1) shall not be usedfor shoring.(3) Erected shoring equipment shall be inspected immediately prior to,during, and immediately after concrete placement.(4) Shoring equipment that is found to be damaged or weakened after erection,such that its strength is reduced to less than that required by andSection;1926.703(a)(1), shall be immediately reinforced.(5) The sills for shoring shall be sound, rigid, and capable of carryingthe maximum intended load.(6) All base plates, shore heads, extension devices, and adjustment screwsshall be in firm contact, and secured when necessary, with the foundationand the form.(7) Eccentric loads on shore heads and similar members shall be prohibitedunless these members have been designed for such loading.(8) Whenever single post shores are used one on top of another (tiered),the employer shall comply with the following specific requirements in additionto the general requirements for formwork:(i) The design of the shoring shall be prepared by a qualified designerand the erected shoring shall be inspected by an engineer qualified instructural design.(ii) The single post shores shall be vertically aligned.(iii) The single post shores shall be spliced to prevent misalignment.(iv) The single post shores shall be adequately braced in two mutuallyperpendicular directions at the splice level. Each tier shall also be diagonallybraced in the same two directions.(9) Adjustment of single post shores to raise formwork shall not be madeafter the placement of concrete.(10) Reshoring shall be erected, as the original forms and shores are removed,whenever the concrete is required to support loads in excess of its capacity.(c) <T3>Vertical slip forms.</T3> (1) The steel rods or pipes on which jacksclimb or by which the forms are lifted shall be_(i) Specifically designed for that purpose; and(ii) Adequately braced where not encased in concrete.(2) Forms shall be designed to prevent excessive distortion of the structureduring the jacking operation. (3) All vertical slip forms shall be provided with scaffolds or work platformswhere employees are required to work or pass.(4) Jacks and vertical supports shall be positioned in such a manner thatthe loads do not exceed the rated capacity of the jacks.(5) The jacks or other lifting devices shall be provided with mechanicaldogs or other automatic holding devices to support the slip forms wheneverfailure of the power supply or lifting mechanism occurs.(6) The form structure shall be maintained within all design tolerancesspecified for plumbness during the jacking operation.(7) The predetermined safe rate of lift shall not be exceeded.(d) <T3>Reinforcing steel.</T3> (1) Reinforcing steel for walls, piers, columns,and similar vertical structures shall be adequately supported to preventoverturning and to prevent collapse.(2) Employers shall take measures to prevent unrolled wire mesh from recoiling.Such measures may include, but are not limited to, securing each end ofthe roll or turning over the roll.(e) <T3>Removal of formwork.</T3> (1) Forms and shores (except those used forslabs on grade and slip forms) shall not be removed until the employerdetermines that the concrete has gained sufficient strength to supportits weight and superimposed loads. Such determination shall be based oncompliance with one of the following:(i) The plans and specifications stipulate conditions for removal of formsand shores, and such conditions have been followed, or(ii) The concrete has been properly tested with an appropriate ASTM standardtest method designed to indicate the concrete compressive strength, andthe test results indicate that the concrete has gained sufficient strengthto support its weight and superimposed loads.(2) Reshoring shall not be removed until the concrete being supported hasattained adequate strength to support its weight and all loads in placeupon it.<ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix to </ITAG>andSection; 1926.703(a)(1)<ITAG tagnum="74">General Requirements for Formwork</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20"/><T3>(This Appendix is non-mandatory.)</T3><ITAG tagnum="21">This appendix serves as a non-mandatory guideline to assist employersin complying with the formwork requirements in andSection; 1926.703(a)(1).Formwork which has been designed, fabricated, erected, braced, supportedand maintained in accordance with Sections 6 and 7 of the American NationalStandard for Construction and Demolition Operations_Concrete and MasonryWork, ANSI A10.9-1983, shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisionof andSection; 1926.703(a)(1).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Information collection requirements contained in paragraph (a)(2)were approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number1218-0095)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1926.704</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for precast concrete.</ITAG>(a) Precast concrete wall units, structural framing, and tilt-up wall panelsshall be adequately supported to prevent overturning and to prevent collapseuntil permanent connections are completed.(b) Lifting inserts which are embedded or otherwise attached to tilt-upprecast concrete members should be capable of supporting at least two timesthe maximum intended load applied or transmitted to them.(c) Lifiting inserts which are embedded or otherwise attached to precastconcrete members, other than the tilt-up members, shall be capable of supportingat least four times the maximum intended load applied or transmitted tothem.(d) Lifting hardware shall be capable of supporting at least five timesthe maximum intended load applied or transmitted to the lifting hardware.(e) No employee shall be permitted under precast concrete members beinglifted or tilted into position except those employees required for theerection of those members.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1926.705</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for lift-slab operations.</ITAG>In addition to the general requirements of this Subpart, employers engagedin lift-slab operations shall comply with the existing specific requirementsfor lift-slab operations which are prescribed in ANSI A10.9-1970. Theserequirements, found in Section 11 of the American National Standard SafetyRequirements for Concrete Construction and Masonry Work, ANSI, A10.9-1970,are reprinted in the Appendix to this section. In addition, there are applicablerequirements in andSection; 1926.305 (a) and (b) of the Construction Safetyand Health Standards which apply to jacks in general, and jacks used specificallyin lift-slab construction.<ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix to </ITAG>andSection; 1926.705_Lift-Slab Operations<ITAG tagnum="74">(Reprinted from ANSI A10.9-1970)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20"/><T3>(This Appendix is Mandatory.)</T3><ITAG tagnum="73">Section 11. Lift-Slab Operations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.1 General. The safety requirements and recommendations in Section11 apply specifically to lift-slab construction operations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.2 Design and Planning. Lift-slab operations shall be designed andplanned by a qualified professional engineer or architect. Such plans anddesigns shall include detailed instructions and sketches indicating theprescribed method of erection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.3 Jacking Equipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.3.1 Jacking equipment shall not be loaded beyond its safe workingcapacity, and then threaded rods and other members that transmit loadsto the jacks shall have a minimum safety factor of 2.5. Jacking equipmentused in lift-slab operations shall meet the criteria in 11.3.1 through11.3.4. (Note: ANSI has interpreted this provision to mean that the safetyfactor of 2.5 must be met for all jacking components such as jacks, threadedrods, lifting nuts, lifting angles, as well as shearheads, columns andfootings).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.3.2 Jacks shall be so designed and installed so that they willnot continue to lift when overloaded.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.3.3 Jacks shall be installed with a safety device which will enablethem to continue to support the load in any position should the jack malfunctionand lose its lifting ability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.3.4 The maximum number of manually-controlled jacks on one slabshall be limited to 14, and in no event should the number be too greatto permit the operator to maintain the slab level within specified tolerances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.4 Uniform Lifting. Jacking operations shall be synchronized insuch a manner as to insure even and uniform lifting of the slab. Duringlifting, all points of the slab support shall be kept within one-half inchof that needed to maintain the slab in a level position. If leveling isautomatically controlled, a device shall be installed which will stop theoperation when the one-half-inch tolerance is exceeded or when there isa malfunction in the jacking system. If level is maintained by manual controls,such controls shall be located in a central location and attended by atrained operator while lifting is in progress. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11.5 Falling Hazard. No one shall be permitted under the slab duringjacking operations. (Note: ANSI has interpreted this provision as follows:``No one is permitted in the building during jacking operations exceptthose employees required for the jacking operation and to secure slabs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1926.706 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for masonry construction. </ITAG>(a) A limited access zone shall be established whenever a masonry wallis being constructed. The limited access zone shall confirm to the following.(1) The limited access zone shall be established prior to the start ofconstruction of the wall. (2) The limited access zone shall be equal to the height of the wall tobe constructed plus four feet, and shall run the entire length of the wall.(3) The limited access zone shall be established on the side of the wallwhich will be unscaffolded. (4) The limited access zone shall be restricted to entry by employees activelyengaged in constructing the wall. No other employees shall be permittedto enter the zone. (5) The limited access zone shall remain in place until the wall is adequatelysupported to prevent overturning and to prevent collapse unless the heightof wall is over eight feet, in which case, the limited access zone shallremain in place until the requirements of paragraph (b) of this sectionhave been met. (b) All masonry walls over eight feet in height shall be adequately bracedto prevent overturning and to prevent collapse unless the wall is adequatelysupported so that it will not overturn or collapse. The bracing shall remainin place until permanent supporting elements of the structure are in place.<ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix A to Subpart Q_References to Subpart Q of Part 1926 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20"/><T3>(This Appendix is non-mandatory.) </T3><ITAG tagnum="21">The following non-mandatory references provide information which canbe helpful in understanding and complying with the requirements containedin Subpart Q. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Accident Prevention Manual for Industrial Operations; EighthEdition; National Safety Council. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Building Code Requirements for Reinforced Concrete (ACI 318-83).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Formwork for Concrete (ACI SP-4). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Recommended Practice for Concrete Formwork (ACI 347-78).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Safety Requirements for Concrete and Masonry Work (ANSI A10.9-1983).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Standard Test Method for Compressive Strength of CylindricalConcrete Specimens (ASTM C39-86). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Standard Test Method for Making and Curing Concrete TestSpecimens in the Field (ASTM C31-85). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Standard Test Method for Penetration Resistance of HardenedConcrete (ASTM C803-82). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Standard Test Method for Compressive Strength of ConcreteCylinders Cast In-Place in Cylindrical Molds (ASTM C873-85). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Standard Method for Developing Early Age Compressive TestValues and Projecting Later Age Strengths (ASTM C918-80). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Recommended Practice for Inspection and Testing Agenciesfor Concrete, Steel and Bituminous Materials as Used in Construction (ASTME329-77). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Method of Making and Curing Concrete Test Specimens in theLaboratory (ASTM C192-88). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Methods of Obtaining and Testing Drilled Cores and SawedBeams of Concrete (ASTM C42-87). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Methods of Securing, Preparing and Testing Specimens fromHardened Lightweight Insulating Concrete for Compressive Strength (ASTMC513-86). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Test Method for Comprehensive Strength of Lightweight InsulatingConcrete (ASTM C495-86). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Method of Making, Accelerating Curing, and Testing of ConcreteCompression Test Specimens (ASTM C684-81). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Test Method for Compressive Strength of Concrete Using Portionsof Beams Broken in Flexure (ASTM C116-68 (1980)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-13471 Filed 6-15-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>